The Marked One and The Invisible Observer

A Historical Fiction Narrative

Author: João Vitor Perazzolo
Pen Name: Johnny Kestler
License: CC BY-SA 4.0

Table of Contents

1. Introduction
2. Historical Context
3. Ezequiel ben-Avraham: The Marked One
4. Johann "Johnny" Kestler: The Invisible Observer
5. The Intersection of Two Lives
6. Theological Foundations
7. Key Moments and Scenes
8. Legacy and Documentation

Introduction

This document presents the complete character profiles and narrative framework for two interconnected lives spanning
the late 19th and early 20th centuries in Eastern Europe: Ezequiel ben-Avraham (1847-1905), a Jewish convert to
Christianity who suffered under severe spiritual oppression for 48 years, and Johann "Johnny" Kestler (1864-1912), a
German scientist who observed and documented Ezequiel's life in secret for 13 years.

Their stories explore themes of suffering and grace, observation and participation, faith and doubt, presence and absence.
Together, they form a narrative about what it means to be human in the face of overwhelming darkness—and what
"sufficient grace" looks like when healing doesn't come.

Historical Context

Time Period: 1847-1912

Why This Era?

1. Rich Religious Tension: An age of great theological debates, revivals, and deeply rooted superstition
2. Geographic Isolation: Carpathian mountain regions allowed isolated communities where the supernatural seemed

closer

3. Cultural Transition: Modernity (science, rationalism) clashing with ancient traditions
4. Historical Persecutions: Context of anti-Semitism and heresy hunts made Ezequiel's persecution plausible
5. Jewish-Christian Mysticism: Region with strong tradition of mysticism, Kabbalah, and Orthodox Christianity

Geographic Settings

Tzfat-Carpathia (Ezequiel's Origin)

Small mountain village, 300-400 inhabitants
Mixed population (Ashkenazi Jews, Romanian Orthodox, some Catholics)
Subsistence agriculture and small trade economy
Isolated by snow 3-4 months per year

Atmosphere where the veil between visible and invisible seemed thin

Heidelberg, Germany (Johnny's Origin)

Prestigious university center since 1386
Mix of German Romanticism and scientific rationalism
Intellectual community but socially conservative
Where Johnny's development as the perfect instrument of observation flourished

Carpathian Mountains Region (Their Intersection)

Border between Transylvania and Moldavia
Austro-Hungarian Empire territory
Remote villages, Orthodox monasteries, ancient forests
Setting where their lives would intersect for 13 years

Ezequiel ben-Avraham: The Marked One

I. BASIC INFORMATION

Full Name: Ezequiel ben-Avraham (son of Abraham)
Meaning: "God strengthens" / "God will strengthen"
Nicknames:

"Zeke" (used by Simeon in moments of intimacy)
"The Marked One" (by hunters)
"The Holy Sufferer" (by the cult, to his discomfort)

Age in Main Narrative: 34-58 years (story spans 24 years)
Year of Birth: 1847
Year of Death: 1905 (age 58)
Location: Austro-Hungarian Empire, Carpathian region (Transylvania-Moldavia border)

II. FAMILY HISTORY: THE ORIGIN OF SPIRITUAL VULNERABILITY

The Ancestral Sin (Five Generations Prior)

Protagonist of Original Sin: Mordechai ben-Yaakov (1747-1801)

Historical Context: During the pogroms of 1768 (Uman Massacre), Mordechai lost his wife and three children.
Desperate, bitter against God, he sought "justice" through forbidden means.

The Forbidden Act: In a moment of extreme despair and rage against God, Mordechai sought a practitioner of dark
Kabbalah. Together, they performed a forbidden ritual invoking "divine vengeance" against persecutors. But they did not
invoke YHWH—they opened a spiritual door through occult practices, invoking forces that should not be touched.

The ritual involved elements of the "Fallen Watchers" mentioned in 1 Enoch (apocryphal text informing folklore).
Mordechai never knew what he was truly dealing with, only that he was accessing power beyond the veil—and that was
enough for his spiritual destruction.

The demonic entity that responded through the veil offered "power to protect and avenge." Mordechai, blinded by pain,
participated in the ritual—not a "formal pact," but a voluntary opening of a grave spiritual door.

Immediate Consequences:

Mordechai gained temporary unnatural strength
Managed to defend community in subsequent attack
But began to deteriorate mentally

Died at 54, insane, muttering about "eyes in the darkness"

The Generational Vulnerability: Not Automatic Curse, But Open Door

THEOLOGICAL IMPORTANCE: What Mordechai created was NOT an unbreakable magical curse that God
imposed on innocent descendants. Under the New Covenant, every curse was broken at the Cross of Christ (Galatians
3:13). Ezequiel was not under divine condemnation.

What he inherited was a spiritual vulnerability—like cycles of trauma, abuse, or destructive patterns that pass from
parents to children through natural and spiritual mechanisms. The spiritual door opened by Mordechai created:

1. A breach that the enemy exploited (not God punishing him)
2. Temporal consequences of ancestral sin (similar to how children of alcoholics have genetic/environmental

vulnerabilities)

3. Unconsecrated spiritual territory in the family lineage

Crucially: God permitted this within His sovereignty (as He permitted Job's oppression), but not as arbitrary
punishment. The redemptive purpose would be revealed through Ezequiel's faithfulness.

Generational Pattern:

The vulnerability did not manifest equally in each generation—it depended on spiritual factors, individual temperament,
and personal choices:

1. First Generation (Mordechai's son): Terrible nightmares, premature death at 41
2. Second Generation: Violent temperament, severe depression
3. Third Generation: Chronic undiagnosed illness, social isolation
4. Fourth Generation (Avraham, Ezequiel's father): Deep melancholy, but functional
5. Fifth Generation (Ezequiel): The oppression reaches full intensity—as if all generations converged in him,

combined with his spiritually sensitive temperament

Avraham ben-Shmuel (Ezequiel's Father) - 1819-1871

Profile:

Scribe and Torah copyist
Gentle man, but tormented by melancholy he never understood
Vaguely aware of "open spiritual door" in lineage, but treated it as superstition
Deeply loved his wife and son
Died when Ezequiel was 24, of "heart failure" (likely heart attack)
Last words to Ezequiel: "Forgive us... forgive us..."

Rachael (Ezequiel's Mother) - 1825-1893

Profile:

Orthodox Christian converted to Judaism to marry Avraham
Woman of deep and practical faith
Only one who genuinely believed in Ezequiel's oppression from the beginning
Tireless intercessor
Lived to see the beginning of Ezequiel's liberation
Died in peace, holding his hand, murmuring Psalm 23

III. CHILDHOOD AND YOUTH (1847-1871)

Early Years (0-7 years)

Initial Manifestations:

Baby who cried incessantly at night
Nightmares before even being able to articulate words
Refusal to enter certain rooms of the house
"Old" look that disturbed adults
Frequently ill, but doctors never found specific cause

Community Reaction: Tzfat-Carpathia was small enough for everyone to notice "something wrong" with young
Ezequiel:

Some old women made signs against evil eye when he passed
Local rabbi tried blessings, without lasting success
Orthodox priest suggested exorcism, but parents refused (Ezequiel was not possessed)
Other children instinctively avoided him

The Lonely Childhood (7-14 years)

Education:

Studied Torah with father (cultural expectation)
Learned to read Hebrew, Aramaic, Russian, Romanian
Sharp intelligence, but difficulty concentrating due to "mental invasions"
Found initial solace in Psalms, especially those of lament

First Manifestations of "Openings":

The Visions (age 9): First time he saw something beyond the veil—shadows moving with autonomy, shapes that
shouldn't exist. Tried to tell parents. Mother believed. Father wanted to believe it was imagination.

The Perception (age 11): Began to "feel" oppressions on other people. Could identify when someone was under spiritual
attack. This isolated him even more—knew too much, too soon.

The Amplified Wrath (age 13 - crucial incident): An older boy mocked him cruelly. Ezequiel felt anger arise... but
amplified a thousand times. For a moment, he genuinely wanted to kill. Pushed the boy with force he shouldn't have.
Was terrified of himself.

This was the moment he realized: "There is something profoundly wrong with me."

Adolescence and Deterioration (14-21 years)

Physical Aggravation:

Age 16: First manifestation of chronic "illness"—extreme fatigue, joint pain
Age 18: Persistent cough, weight loss
Age 20: Pale skin, permanent dark circles, appearance of slowly dying

Social Isolation:

Couldn't maintain friendships
Romantic interest was impossible
Began avoiding synagogues (presence of others amplified oppression)
Refuge: books, solitary nature, conversations with mother

Spiritual State: This phase is crucial—Ezequiel was still NOT converted. He:

Bitterly questioned the God of his parents
"Why me? What did I do to deserve this?"
Considered suicide multiple times (only didn't because of love for mother)
Was lost not only under oppression, but also in sin
Thought: "If God exists and is good, why does He allow this? Maybe He doesn't exist. Or He exists and hates me."

IV. THE CONVERSION (1868 - Age 21)

Rock Bottom

Winter of 1868. Ezequiel is at his lowest point:

Health deteriorated to barely able to leave bed
Father looking with helpless despair
Mother praying hours a day, in vain (or so it seemed)
He decided: "When spring comes, I'll throw myself off Moldov cliff. I can't anymore."

The Encounter with Yeshua (Jesus)

Three Weeks Before Planned Suicide:

Mother brought him borrowed books from Orthodox church (she maintained connections with old faith). One of them:
New Testament in Russian.

Ezequiel opened it with contempt: "I'll read the foolishness that led my mother to trade truth for lies."

He began reading the Gospels.

Something strange happened. The words of Jesus—especially in Matthew 11:28—penetrated:

"Come to me, all who are weary and burdened, and I will give you rest."

For the first time in years, he cried. Not from despair, but from... hope? Desire?

He read compulsively:

The woman infirm for 18 years whom Jesus called "daughter of Abraham" bound by Satan (Luke 13)
The demon-possessed freed
The promise: "If the Son sets you free, you will be free indeed" (John 8:36)
And especially: "In this world you will have trouble. But take heart! I have overcome the world" (John 16:33)

He thought: "He knows about suffering. He understands."

The Decision

One night, alone in his room (parents sleeping), Ezequiel knelt:

"God of my mother, God of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob... Jesus, if you are who you say you are, if you truly
overcame... I need you. I am lost. In my own sin and under this oppression. I cannot save myself. If you
can... save me."

What happened:

There was NO instant healing. There was NO bright light or audible voice.

But there was something DEEPER:

Inexplicable peace, like an anchor thrown in a storm
Internal certainty: "I am accepted. I am loved. I am forgiven."
For the first time, the oppressive "voices" seemed... distant? As if a barrier had appeared
And a clear perception: "I will still suffer. But I am no longer alone."

Immediate Consequences:

1. Mother Rachael wept with joy when he told her
2. Father Avraham was deeply conflicted (saw it as betrayal of Jewish faith)

3. Jewish community treated him as apostate
4. Ezequiel didn't care—had found what he was looking for: not cure, but Savior

V. THE YEARS OF GROWTH (1868-1879)

Learning to Fight (Ages 21-30)

The First Stumbles:

Ezequiel assumed conversion = automatic cure. It wasn't.
First week: temptations returned even stronger (demonic forces trying to regain lost ground)
First month: fell into explosive anger, hurt someone verbally, had to ask forgiveness
First year: cycles of victory and defeat, slowly learning

The Difficult Discipleship:

Where to learn? Jewish community rejected him. Orthodox church was cold (he was "converted Jew"—always suspect).

But God provided:

Father António Radu (1825-1877): Old Orthodox priest in neighboring village. Man who had seen too much to doubt
the supernatural. Became Ezequiel's first mentor.

Taught:

Systematic prayer (liturgical hours)
Fasting as spiritual weapon
Patristics (church fathers on spiritual warfare)
But especially: humility

"Ezequiel, my son, you are being trained in warfare most will never see. This doesn't make you special. It
makes you servant."

Father António Radu died in 1877. Last words to Ezequiel: "You will survive this. And you will help others. That's what
it's for."

The Internal Exile (1871-1879)

After father's death (1871): Avraham died without fully reconciling with Ezequiel's choice. This tormented him for
years.

Ezequiel and mother moved to smaller house. He did occasional work (copyist, translator, helper), but illness limited.

Spiritual Discoveries of This Phase:

1. The Bible as Weapon: Memorized entire books. Psalms, Isaiah, almost complete New Testament.
2. Communion as Necessity: Realized he couldn't survive isolated. Forced himself to attend services, even when

painful.

3. Fasting as Portal: Discovered prolonged fasting (3-7 days) temporarily weakened oppression, gave mental clarity.
4. Authority in Jesus' Name: First time (age 26) he rebuked direct demonic manifestation and it obeyed. Was

revelation: "I have authority. Not by merit, but by being in Christ."

VI. MATURITY FORGED IN FIRE (1879-1895)

The Meeting with Simeon (1879)

Who is Simeon: Father Simeon Petrescu, Romanian Orthodox, 38 years old, scholar and theologian, known in region for
knowledge of patristics and texts on spiritual warfare. Sent by Orthodox bishopric to investigate "reports of unusual
demonic activity" in Carpathian region.

First Meeting: Simeon heard about Ezequiel through rumors. Skeptical but curious, went to investigate.

Found: 32-year-old man looking 50, pale, but with intense eyes. Talked for hours.

Simeon recorded in diary:

"Either he is the most convincing charlatan I've ever met, or I am before a genuine and terrifying spiritual
phenomenon. I don't know which possibility scares me more."

Decided to stay, observe, test.

Simeon's Test: Took Ezequiel to deliverance prayer session for young oppressed woman in neighboring village.
Ezequiel:

Precisely identified the nature of oppression
Knew details he couldn't know
During prayer, Ezequiel entered intense physical pain (demonic attack to stop him)
But woman was freed

Simeon: "Forgive me for doubting, brother. You are real. And you need help."

Alliance is Born: Simeon became:

Primary intercessor
Theological defender
Closest friend
The person Ezequiel called when darkness was unbearable

The Years of Paradoxical Ministry (1880-1895)

The Paradox: Ezequiel, the most oppressed man they knew, became one of the most effective liberators in the region.

How was this possible?

1. Experiential Knowledge: He knew how oppression operated because he lived under it
2. Absence of Arrogance: He never saw himself as "powerful"—only as broken vessel used by God
3. Conquered Authority: Decades resisting developed genuine spiritual authority
4. Deep Compassion: He understood the pain of the oppressed like no one else

Notable Cases:

The Girl of Kosiv (1881): Possessed child, everyone failed. Ezequiel fasted 7 days, prayed all night. Complete
liberation. Almost died in process.

The Village of Roznov (1885): Territorial oppression affecting entire families. Ezequiel identified occult objects buried
under church. Their destruction brought peace.

The Rabbi of Mukachevo (1888): Jewish leader who secretly sought him (not to be seen). Ezequiel freed him, never
told anyone.

The Burden of "Holy Sufferer" (1887-1895)

Emergence of Cult: As fame grew, people began to:

Attribute miracles to his presence
Seek pieces of his clothing as "relics"
Ask him to pray over objects to "sanctify" them
Some even drank water he touched

Ezequiel's Reaction: Absolute horror. He constantly:

Redirected worship to Christ
Refused payment
Hid when crowds came
Preached: "There is no power in me! I am the weakest! Only in Christ!"

But the cult persisted. This tormented him almost as much as oppression.

The Persecution Intensifies (1890-1895)

The Brotherhood of the Vigilantes: Extremist order originated from Catholic schism in 15th century. Founded by group
of monks who believed official church had become "soft" on heresy. Over centuries, became increasingly radical,
operating in shadows, with violent methods justified by distorted Scripture interpretations.

Their Distorted Prophecy: Ancient texts of Brotherhood mentioned "The Marked One who will bring darkness upon
the church." When they heard about Ezequiel:

Interpreted he was fulfillment
Decided killing him would prevent apocalypse
Sent one of their most zealous members: Frater Hieronymus

Frater Hieronymus Vigilius (born Moishe ben-Yosef): Tragic irony—he was also converted Jew, but to extremist
Catholicism.

His story:

Born Moishe ben-Yosef in 1832, in Orthodox Jewish family
At 18, witnessed pogrom that killed entire family
In despair and rage, blamed both murderers and God of his fathers for "not protecting"
Converted to Catholicism, but radically—seeking "stronger God"
Joined Brotherhood of Vigilantes at 20
Adopted name "Hieronymus Vigilius" (Jerome, the Vigilant)
Dedicated 40 years to "purifying" church through violence
Saw in Ezequiel distorted and threatening reflection of himself

Hunt (1892-1895): Ezequiel had to flee constantly:

Left home village
Lived as itinerant
Simeon hid him in remote monasteries
Most lonely and difficult period

But also period of greatest growth: Without distractions, without "ministry," just him and God. Learned what Paul
learned: "When I am weak, then I am strong."

VII. THE ATTEMPT AT BREAKING (1895 - Age 48)

The Decision

After 27 years since conversion, Ezequiel was:

Physically: deteriorated, looking like 70-year-old man
Spiritually: at apex of maturity
Emotionally: tired, but determined

Simeon and group of intercessors (6 people who faithfully supported him) proposed:

"Let's confront oppression directly. Invoke Cross's authority over spiritual door opened by ancestor. Try to
close this once and for all."

Ezequiel hesitated: "It could kill me."

Simeon: "You're already dying. At least die fighting for freedom."

The Preparation

Two weeks of collective fasting:

Group isolated in abandoned monastery in mountains
Prayer 18 hours a day
Study of Scriptures on authority in Christ
Confession of sins, reconciliations
Preparation for possible death of Ezequiel

The Night of Confrontation

Duration: Sunset to dawn (approximately 12 hours)

Structure:

1. Formal Renunciation: Ezequiel verbally renounced all spiritual door opened by Mordechai and any generational

vulnerability

2. Invocation of Cross: Declared authority of Christ's blood over oppression
3. Direct Confrontation: Ordered, in Jesus' name, oppression to be broken and spiritual doors closed

What happened:

First Hour: Strange, almost unnatural peace
Second Hour: Ezequiel began to feel chest pressure
Third Hour: Most intense visions he ever had—glimpses of Abyss, of demonic forces
Fourth Hour: Extreme physical pain, as if body was being torn from inside
Fifth Hour: Uncontrollable screams, intercessors holding him physically
Sixth Hour: Moment of despair, temptation to renounce Christ to stop pain
Seventh Hour: Sudden silence... and then Ezequiel whispered:

"Do not let the sun go down on your anger... but the wrath of the Lamb consumed all claims against
me. The Cross closed what was opened. I am free."

Eighth-Twelfth Hour: Silent, interior battle, in invisible realm

At dawn: Ezequiel fainted. Remained unconscious for three days.

When he awoke, reported:

Visions ceased completely
The oppressive "voice" was... absent
His body, though still ill, seemed... lighter?

Crucial question: Was the spiritual door completely closed?

Theological answer: Yes, positionally—the Cross's victory was applied, the door opened by Mordechai was closed by
Christ's authority. Ezequiel was legally free.

But scars remained—decades of physical, mental, and spiritual trauma don't disappear instantly. Liberation was real, but
practical appropriation of that freedom would be continuous process.

VIII. THE FINAL YEARS (1895-1905)

Positional Freedom and Progressive Appropriation (1895-1903)

Tangible Changes:

Constant oppression reduced to occasional attacks (now external, not internal)
Could sleep without regular nightmares
Health stabilized (didn't improve, but stopped worsening)
For first time in 48 years, experienced joy without immediate fear

But:

Body maintained damage from decades of attack
Moments of relapse when under great stress
Spiritual perception remained (not curse, but permanent consequence—like Paul with "thorn in flesh")

The Theological Reality: Ezequiel learned crucial distinction:

Positional liberation: Conquered at Cross, applied in 1895
Experiential liberation: Process of learning to walk in authority he already possessed
Permanent scars: Marks of combat that remained until death

As he himself would say:

"The door was closed. The chains were broken. But the body still remembers the wounds. Victory doesn't
mean absence of pain—it means pain no longer defines me."

The Redirected Ministry (1895-1903)

Instead of dramatic liberations, Ezequiel became:

Comforter of afflicted: People sought his wisdom about suffering
Mentor of young warriors: Taught spiritual warfare based on experience
Writer: Began documenting his journey (manuscripts partially preserved)

His constant theme:

"Victory is not absence of battle. It is faithfulness in midst of it."

Reconciliation with Miriam (1898)

Miriam bat-David: Woman he had known years before, also oppressed (more lightly). He had ministered liberation to
her in 1885. They remained friends for years, but he always kept distance (thought he would bring danger).

1898: She, now 36, sought him:

"Ezequiel, you've lived in fear all your life. Now that you have freedom, will you waste it still with fear?
God gave us to each other. Don't reject gift out of false humility."

They married in small ceremony (1898).

The Question of Children:

Initially, Ezequiel refused to have children. Visceral terror of passing vulnerability forward dominated.

Simeon confronted him theologically (1899):

"Brother, you preach that Christ broke every curse at Cross. Galatians 3:13. Do you believe that or not? The
spiritual door was closed. Mordechai has no more power over your descendants. Is Christ's blood sufficient
or not?"

Ezequiel struggled for months between:

Objective truth: Christ overcame, curse broken
Subjective trauma: Deep and visceral fear

Diary of 1900:

"Simeon is theologically right. But body has memory. Heart has scars. Will I ever be able to trust Christ's
victory so completely that fear loses power? Miriam says she wants children. I... I want too. But what if...?"

Final conversation with Miriam (1901):

Miriam: "Will you let enemy win even after defeated? Fear is last chain, Ezequiel. We need to break it together."

Ezequiel: "What if I'm wrong? What if vulnerability passes?"

Miriam: "Then we'll raise our children knowing Christ from cradle. Teach them warfare. But also teach them joy. And
trust that Lamb's blood is sufficient."

Final decision: They decided to trust. To try. But Miriam didn't get pregnant in following years (1901-1903). Ezequiel
oscillated between secret relief and genuine sadness.

Simeon suggested:

"Perhaps God, in His mercy, is sparing you this anxiety. Or perhaps preparing something different. Trust His
timing."

They didn't have biological children, but in final years "informally adopted" several young people from region seeking
spiritual mentoring. Became spiritual parents to many.

Ezequiel's mature reflection (1902):

"I learned that faith doesn't eliminate fear instantly. Faith chooses to believe despite fear. Simeon was right
—curse was broken. But I needed to learn to live in that reality, not just declare it. Process is slow. But it's
real."

The Arrival of Hieronymus (1903)

The Final Confrontation:

Frater Hieronymus finally found him. Surprisingly, didn't come with sword, but with... question:

"How did you survive? I hunt demons for 30 years and am empty. You were persecuted by them and are at
peace. Why?"

MODIFICATION: The Conversion Process

Unlike original where conversion happened quickly, story developed thus:

First Meeting (March 1903): Ezequiel shared complete testimony. Hieronymus, 71-year-old man who dedicated life to
"purifying" church through violence, listened in tense silence.

At end, stood up:

"You are heretic or saint. I still don't know. I need to think."

Left. Ezequiel thought he wouldn't see him again.

Second Meeting (May 1903): Hieronymus returned, more agitated:

"I read Scriptures you quoted. About sufficient grace. About Christ bearing curse. But if that's true... then
everything I did was useless? Worse than useless—was evil?"

Ezequiel: "Not useless. Wrong. But not irreversible. There's still time."

Hieronymus, furious: "Easy for you to say! You suffered passively. I became monster actively!"

Left again, more disturbed.

Third Meeting (July 1903): Hieronymus appeared at night, crying for first time in decades:

"I killed people. In God's name, I killed people who were perhaps innocent. How can Christ forgive that?"

Ezequiel, perceiving through spiritual discernment who he truly was, whispered:

"Moishe... brother Moishe... you don't need to carry this alone anymore."

Using his original Jewish name—name he had renounced 53 years before—broke something fundamental inside him.

Fourth Meeting (August 1903): Moishe (he asked to use name again, at least with Ezequiel) confessed everything.
Each death. Each torture justified as "holy".

Ezequiel cried with him. Simeon was called. Together, they ministered deep repentance.

Restoration Process (August-December 1903): Not instant conversion, but painful deconstruction:

Moishe had to confront each victim in prayer
Publicly asked forgiveness from church leadership
Surrendered to authorities (who, due to advanced age, confined him to monastery)
Began slow process of rebuilding identity in Christ

Last Request (January 1904):

"Ezequiel... teach me to fight the right way. I don't have much time. But I want to die having done at least
one thing right."

Moishe's Last Months (January-October 1904):

Moishe lived his last months in monastery, learning from Ezequiel:

To fight spiritual warfare through prayer, not violence
To genuinely love enemies
To trust in Cross, not own effort
To carry pain without inflicting it on others

Developed genuine friendship with Ezequiel—two men marked by pain, united in Christ.

Moishe's Death (October 1904): Died in peace, reconciled with God and with his Jewish-Christian identity. Last words:

"Yeshua... forgave even me. Ezequiel... thank you for not giving up on me. Shalom."

Ezequiel stayed by his side until end. Afterward, wrote:

"I saw grace's power today. If Christ can redeem Moishe—man who killed in His name—then truly there is
no limit to mercy. This gives me hope."

Moments of Joy (1898-1903)

ADDITION: Scenes showing grace not just sustaining, but giving joy

Autumn 1899: Ezequiel and Miriam walking in mountains. He stopped, breathed deeply:

"Smell of leaves. I... I had forgotten to notice things like this. For decades, everything was just surviving
next day. But today... today I just see beauty. Just that."

Miriam smiled:

"Grace isn't just rope preventing you from falling. Sometimes it's wing letting you fly."

Spring 1900: Simeon visited for dinner. Conversation derived to theology, then to politics, then to... ridiculous jokes
about Orthodox priests.

Ezequiel laughed. Genuinely. Belly hurting from laughing so much.

When silence returned, he had tears in eyes:

"You know... for years I thought joy was incompatible with holiness. That laughing was disrespect to
suffering. But today I realized: joy doesn't betray pain. Joy proves pain didn't win."

Winter 1901: First snow of season. Miriam dragged him outside: "Let's make snow angels!"

Ezequiel, hesitant: "I'm 54 years old..."

Miriam: "Exactly. Time to recover childhood they stole from you."

They made snow angels. Threw snowballs. Came back soaked, laughing, happy.

That night, Ezequiel wrote:

"God didn't promise to remove all suffering in this life. But today I learned that, even amid scars, He grants
moments of pure joy. Gratuitous. Undeserved. Simply because He loves us."

Miriam's Death (1903)

ADDITION: Showing community sustaining Ezequiel

August 1903: Miriam suddenly fell ill. Fever that wouldn't drop. Doctors found no cause.

Ezequiel, terrified, prayed desperately. Simeon and community prayed. Nothing.

She died in three weeks.

The Darkness Returns: For first time since 1895, Ezequiel felt familiar darkness trying to return:

"Did God give me joy only to snatch it away? Why? WHY?"

Suicidal thoughts returned briefly.

But Community Didn't Let Him Fall:

Simeon temporarily moved in to stay with him
Prayer group took turns maintaining constant presence
Young people he mentored visited daily
Elderly widow brought food: "You fed my soul for years. Now let me feed your body."

Crucial Conversation with Simeon (September 1903):

Ezequiel: "Simeon... I don't know if I can continue without her."

Simeon: "You don't need to. We continue for you until you can continue alone. That's how Christ's body works."

Progressive Appropriation: Took six months for Ezequiel to return to normal functioning. During that time:

Didn't minister to anyone
Allowed himself to be ministered to
Learned to receive help without shame
Discovered that strength isn't never falling, but letting others lift you up

Reflection (March 1904):

"Losing Miriam almost destroyed me. But community saved me. I learned distinction I had forgotten: I was
never called to be strong alone. Christ never intended us to be. He gave us each other. That is wisdom."

Ezequiel's Death (1905 - Age 58)

Spring 1905: Body finally succumbed to decades of trauma. Lung disease worsened.

Last Weeks:

Conscious, lucid, at peace
Simeon (now 64) came from monastery to be with him
Young people he mentored took turns in vigil
Entire community prayed
Mother Rachael had died in 1893, but he felt her presence in prayer

Final Conversation with Simeon (April 14):

Ezequiel: "Friend... thank you. For everything. For believing when no one believed. For staying when everyone fled."

Simeon, crying: "My privilege, brother. You taught me more about Christ than all theology books combined."

Ezequiel: "I doubt that. But I thank you for exaggeration." [smiles]

Last Documented Words (April 15, sunset):

"Grace was... sufficient. Not because it stopped suffering. But because He suffered with me. You who come
after... don't fear the shadowy valley. He is there too.

Simeon... take care of the young ones. Teach them to fight, but also to love.

And tell everyone... don't take my journey as prescription. God doesn't require of everyone what He required
of me. Seek liberation aggressively. Seek healing without shame. Use medicine, therapy, community—all
are God's gifts.

My story is not: 'suffer as I suffered.' It is: 'if you suffer, Christ is sufficient.'

The Cross overcame. The doors are closed. I am free.

See you soon."

He died at sunset, April 15, 1905.

Inexplicable Phenomenon: All witnesses present reported: at exact moment of death, they felt "weight" lift from room.
As if oppressive presence no one had consciously perceived suddenly wasn't there anymore.

Oppression died with body. Soul rose free.

IX. PHYSICAL APPEARANCE THROUGH THE YEARS

Childhood (0-14 years)

Beautiful child, but "strange"—eyes too intense
Dark, curly hair (Ashkenazi trait)
Pale skin, prone to bruises
Thin, but not sickly yet
Always cold hands

Youth (14-21 years)

Visible deterioration began
Deep permanent dark circles

Skin acquired translucent quality (visible veins)
Significant weight loss (1.75m, but only 58kg at 21)
Posture began to curve from chronic fatigue
Occasional cough that would become characteristic

Early Adulthood (21-40 years)

At 30 looked 45
Hair began to gray prematurely (at 35, half gray)
Deep wrinkles around eyes (from constant pain)
Hands trembled slightly in moments of stress
Self-inflicted scars from moments of despair (before conversion)
But eyes... eyes remained alive, intense, with depth of one who saw beyond veil

Maturity (40-58 years)

At 48 (after breaking), slight improvement
But damage was permanent
Hair completely white by 50
Curved body, slow movement
Hoarse voice (lung damage)
But face had peace it didn't have before
Smile appeared—rare, but genuine

Most Striking Feature Throughout Life: His eyes. Gray-blue. Could be terrifying (when seeing beyond veil) or deeply
compassionate (when ministering to others). People said: "He sees through you, but not with judgment... with
understanding."

X. COMPLEX PERSONALITY

Central Traits

Forged Humility, Not Natural:

Wasn't born humble—became so through breaking
Genuinely saw himself as "least of saints"
Rejected praise, not from false modesty—genuinely didn't understand why they admired him
"Anyone would do same in my place. I simply had no choice but Christ or death."

Deep Compassion:

Incapable of seeing suffering without being moved
Would give last piece of bread to beggar
Cried easily for others' pains (but rarely for own)
Saw in each oppressed person reflection of himself

Persistent Melancholy:

Even after liberation, carried background sadness
Not clinical depression, but weight of one who carried darkness for decades
Moments of joy were precious because rare
Simeon said: "Ezequiel knows joy deeper than us, because he knows its price."

Dark Sense of Humor (developed with maturity):

In final years, developed capacity to laugh at own situation
Self-deprecating jokes, but without bitterness
"You persecuted wrong man. Demons do worse to me than you ever would."
Simeon noted: this was sign of true interior healing

Uncomfortable Intensity:

Incapable of superficial conversations
Every conversation tended toward deep
People either loved him or avoided him—no middle ground
His presence "weighed"—as if brought spiritual gravity with him

Paradox: Simultaneous Strength and Weakness:

Physically fragile, but spiritually formidable
Shy in groups, but courageous before spiritual oppression
Constantly doubted himself, but never Christ
"I am weak. But He is strong. Therefore, I am stronger than I seem."

Fears and Vulnerabilities

Main Fear: Not of pain (already accustomed), but of:

1. Dragging others into darkness: Recurring nightmare of Simeon or Miriam being attacked for being near him
2. Dying without purpose: "What if all this suffering was waste?"
3. Renouncing Christ in moment of weakness: Genuine terror that one day pain would be too great and he would

blaspheme

4. Passing vulnerability forward: Why he avoided relationships, refused to have children (until working through

this theologically)

Vulnerabilities Enemy Exploited:

Isolation: Constant temptation to distance from everyone "to protect them"
False guilt: Feeling guilty for ancestor's sin, even knowing theologically he wasn't responsible
Comparison: Seeing other Christians with "normal" lives and feeling envy/bitterness
Doubt of God's goodness: In worst moments, whispers: "If He were good, He would end this"

Relationships and Interactions

With God:

Tempestuous relationship like Job
Phases of honest lament: "How long, Lord?"
Phases of deep worship
Learned to pray not just asking for relief, but seeking presence
"In end, I discovered I didn't want healing more than I wanted Him."

With Simeon (Deepest Friendship):

Only person with whom he was completely vulnerable
Simeon saw his doubts, rages, despairs
Could stay in comfortable silence for hours
Simeon challenged him when necessary: "Stop punishing yourself. Christ already paid."
Ezequiel protected him spiritually—detected when Simeon was under attack

With Miriam bat-David (Late Love):

Initially saw only as someone to minister to
She saw man beyond suffering
Relationship was surprisingly... normal? Discussions about simple things, laughter, small plans
She taught him that living isn't just surviving
"Ezequiel, you have permission to be happy. God doesn't require perpetual misery."
Her death in 1903 (two years before his) almost destroyed him, but community sustained him

With Mother:

Deepest bond of entire life
She never doubted him, never abandoned him
Tireless intercessor
In worst moments: "Mother, pray for me. I can't."
Her death in 1893 was devastating loss, but also relief: "She no longer has to suffer seeing me suffer."

With Oppressed Seeking Help:

Initially reluctant (felt hypocritical helping others when couldn't help himself)
With time, realized: his inability to completely free himself made him more compassionate, not less effective
Never promised guaranteed healing, only faithful presence
"I may not be able to take this from you. But I can stay with you while you learn to fight."

With Persecutors:

Prayed for them genuinely (not just as obligation)
Refused to hate them, even when trying to kill him
Saw in them slaves of same darkness that oppressed him
With Hieronymus/Moishe: saw distorted reflection of himself, so ministered with extreme patience
Act of calling him by original Jewish name was most powerful spiritual weapon he used

XI. ABILITIES AND LIMITATIONS

"Abilities" (Actually, Openings from Oppression)

1. Spiritual Perception:

Saw beyond physical veil
Distinguished demonic oppression from mental/physical illness
Felt spiritual "weight" in places and people
Limitation: Didn't control when he saw—invasions happened randomly
Danger: Seeing too much led to extreme mental fatigue

2. Sharpened Discernment:

Read people with unsettling accuracy
Knew when someone lied or hid something
Detected hidden motivations
Limitation: Made relationships difficult—who wants friend who "sees" all secrets?
Danger: Temptation to pride ("I know more than you") or judgment

3. Conquered Spiritual Authority:

Not natural gift, but result of decades resisting
Demons recognized him (not fearing him, but Christ in him)
Effective in liberation and breaking oppressions
Limitation: Cost him physically—each spiritual confrontation left him exhausted for days
Danger: Temptation to trust experience instead of depending on Christ each time

4. Supernatural Empathy:

Felt others' pain almost physically
Genuine gift of Spirit developed through own suffering
Connected instantly with others who suffered
Limitation: Carried others' burdens to point of crushing
Danger: Assuming "savior" role instead of pointer to Savior

Severe Physical Limitations

Chronic Fatigue: Rare days without extreme exhaustion
Constant Pain: Joints, head, lungs—in rotating order
Progressive Lung Disease: Cough, shortness of breath, recurrent infections
Frequent Insomnia: When finally slept, nightmares
Fragility: Injuries healed slowly, got sick easily
Deteriorated Appearance: Created immediate social barrier

Intellectual/Emotional Limitations

Difficulty Concentrating: Mental invasions interrupted thought
Tendency to Melancholy: Constant effort against despair
Social Isolation: Difficulty forming/maintaining relationships
Accumulated Trauma: Spiritual PTSD—triggers that threw him into panic
Social Illiteracy: Years of isolation made him socially awkward

XII. SPIRITUAL DEVELOPMENT: THE THREE ACTS

ACT I: The Desperate Survivor (1868-1879, ages 21-32)

Spiritual State:

Recently converted, fragile but genuine faith
Growing biblical knowledge, minimal experience
Fell frequently, rose with difficulty
Saw spiritual warfare as something to "definitively win"

Lessons Learned:

Salvation is gift, not conquest
Fall doesn't nullify justification
Repentance is daily
Communion is survival, not luxury
Bible is weapon, not theory

Defining Moment: At 28, fell into sexual sin (visited prostitute in moment of extreme despair). Stayed in depression for
week: "I lost salvation. God rejected me."

Father António: "Your sin is real. But Cross is more real. Peter denied Christ three times and was restored. Rise."

This moment taught: grace is greater than failure.

ACT II: The Weary Warrior (1879-1895, ages 32-48)

Spiritual State:

Competent in spiritual warfare
Effective ministry being born
But fatigue accumulating
Growing temptation to give up
"I know how to fight. But I'm so tired."

Lessons Learned:

Victory isn't eliminating battle, it's persevering in it
Strength comes from admitted weakness
Ministry flows from suffering, not success
Rest is spiritual act, not weakness
Loneliness is greater enemy than demons

Defining Moment: 1890—night he almost gave up completely. Knelt to pray, but no words came. Only dry crying.

And then, sensation of presence. Not audible, but unmistakable: "I know. I was on cross. I know."

Didn't heal pain, but healed loneliness. Christ understands.

ACT III: The Mature Saint (1895-1905, ages 48-58)

Spiritual State:

Peace that transcends circumstance
Acceptance without resignation
Wisdom born from decades in furnace
Paradoxical joy—not despite, but through
"I didn't want this path. But I wouldn't trade what I learned."

Lessons Learned:

Purpose greater than personal relief
God's glory worth any price
Suffering isn't end, it's means
Legacy isn't healing, it's faithfulness
Victory is already conquered (at Cross)

Defining Moment: 1898—Conversation with Simeon after marrying Miriam:

"Simeon, today I was happy. Genuinely happy. I laughed from heart's depth. And I realized... this doesn't
betray my past suffering. It honors it. Because I fought so long to get here. Joy doesn't deny pain. Joy proves
pain didn't win."

He finally understood: we don't always win by removing thorn. Sometimes we win by flourishing around it.

XIII. CHARACTERISTIC LANGUAGE AND EXPRESSIONS

Phrases That Define Ezequiel

About Suffering:

"Pain has no purpose by itself. But God never wastes anything."
"I no longer pray for relief. I pray for company in pain."
"Cross didn't promise easy life. Promised meaningful life."

About Faith:

"Faith isn't absence of doubt. It's choice to believe despite it."
"Some days my faith is rock. Other days, grain of sand. But Christ is same."
"I don't feel saved. But salvation isn't feeling."

About Spiritual Warfare:

"Demons are real. But Christ is more real."
"I don't fight to win. Christ already won. I fight not to forget that."
"Enemy's greatest weapon isn't power, it's lie."

About Grace:

"Grace isn't God ignoring sin. It's God bearing it on cross."
"You ask if I'm worthy? I never was. I never will be. And that's precisely the point."
"Sufficient grace doesn't mean pain ends. Means Christ is in it with me."

About Ministry:

"I can't heal you. But I can point to One who can."
"My gift isn't strength. It's having survived long enough to say: there's still hope."
"Sometimes, deepest ministry is simply staying. Not solving, just being present."

About Legacy:

"If my life proves only one thing, let it be this: grace is sufficient."
"I don't want to be remembered as saint. I want to be remembered as survivor by grace."
"My testimony isn't 'God healed me.' It's 'God remained when healing didn't come.'"

ADDITION—About Seeking Help:

"Don't confuse faith with stubbornness. God gave us doctors, therapists, medicines. Using them isn't weakness, it's
wisdom."
"Most Christians will never see what I see. And that doesn't make them less holy. Perhaps even more blessed."
"My journey was specific. Don't take it as universal prescription. Seek liberation aggressively. Seek healing
without shame."

Mannerisms

Unconsciously touched forehead when feeling mental invasion coming
Closed eyes and breathed deeply before ministering liberation
Quoted Psalms in low voice when stressed (especially Psalm 23)
Wrote constantly—spiritual diary was escape valve
Avoided prolonged eye contact (too heavy for others)
Laughed little, but when he did, was genuine and contagious sound
Thanked obsessively—for small things, big things, everything
When meeting someone new, instinctively assessed if they were under spiritual oppression
Had habit of holding crosses or icons when anxious (physical anchor for spiritual truth)

XIV. FUNDAMENTAL QUESTIONS HIS LIFE ANSWERS

1. Does suffering nullify salvation? Ezequiel's Answer: No. Salvation doesn't depend on circumstance, but on Christ.

2. Why does God permit severe oppression upon His own? Ezequiel's Answer: I don't know completely. But I know
He doesn't waste anything. And I know He has sovereignty even over permissions He gives enemy—as He had with Job.

3. Does real faith eliminate doubt? Ezequiel's Answer: No. Faith coexists with doubt and chooses to believe anyway.

4. Is liberation always instantaneous? Ezequiel's Answer: No. Sometimes it's process of decades. Positional victory
comes through Cross, but experiential appropriation can take lifetime.

5. Is victory absence of battle? Ezequiel's Answer: No. Victory is faithfulness amid battle.

6. What is suffering's purpose? Ezequiel's Answer: It's not suffering that has purpose, but what God does through it. He
redeems even what enemy meant for destruction.

7. Is grace truly sufficient? Ezequiel's Answer: Yes. Not because it removes pain, but because it sustains through it.

8. Is persevering worth it? Ezequiel's Answer: Yes. Thousand times yes. Future glory doesn't compare to present
suffering.

9. Must I suffer as Ezequiel suffered to be holy? Ezequiel's Answer: NO. My journey was specific. God doesn't require
of everyone what He required of me. Seek healing. Seek liberation. Use all resources God provides.

XV. LEGACY AFTER DEATH

Immediate (1905-1920)

Division of Opinions:

Group 1—The Devoted (Majority):

Saw him as genuine saint
Shared stories of liberations they witnessed
Kept his writings as treasure
Pilgrimages to tomb began

Group 2—The Skeptics:

Believed he was mentally ill, not oppressed
Attributed "liberations" to psychological suggestion
Considered his life tragic waste

Group 3—The Extremists:

Tried to unofficially canonize him
Sought "relics"
Created false doctrine around his suffering
Exactly what he feared and fought in life

Simeon (lived until 1919) fought against Group 3: Wrote biography "Ezequiel: Testimony of Sufficient Grace," trying
to preserve truth:

"He wasn't superhuman. He was profoundly human, sustained by superhuman God. Don't venerate him.
Learn from him. And remember: he constantly said to seek medical, therapeutic, community help. Don't
romanticize suffering. He didn't."

Medium Term (1920-1950)

Manuscripts preserved by monastery in Moldavia
Story gradually forgotten by most
But occasional prayer circles still used his life as example
World War II almost destroyed all records (saved by monks who hid them)

Long Term (1950-Present in story)

Rediscovery of manuscripts in 1970s
Theologians began studying case as example of:

Generational spiritual vulnerabilities (and how Christ breaks them)
Prolonged spiritual warfare
Theology of suffering
Sufficiency of grace
Progressive appropriation of Christ's victory
God's sovereignty over permissions given to enemy

Real Impact: Not in crowds, but in individuals:

Person with chronic illness reading his story: "If he persevered, I can"
Christian under spiritual oppression: "I'm not crazy. This is real. And I can survive."
Weary warrior: "Victory isn't ending battle. It's remaining in it."
Person tempted to romanticize suffering: "Ezequiel sought relief. Used all resources. I can too."

His True Heritage: Not dramatic miracles, but living proof of 2 Corinthians 12:9.

XVI. FINAL THEOLOGICAL NOTE

Important Clarifications About Ezequiel's Story

1. About Generational Vulnerability vs. Curse:

Ezequiel's oppression was NOT divine punishment for ancestral sin. Under New Covenant, every curse was broken at
Cross (Galatians 3:13).

What he inherited was:

Temporal consequences of Mordechai's sin (similar to how children suffer consequences of parental decisions)
Spiritual breach that enemy exploited (not God punishing him)
Generationally transmitted vulnerability (like family traumas perpetuate)

But crucially: God had sovereignty over all this. Like with Job, Satan only acted with divine permission. There was
redemptive purpose, even when Ezequiel didn't see it.

2. About Oppression vs. Mental Illness:

Ezequiel's story should NOT be used to:

Diagnose all mental illness as spiritual oppression
Avoid appropriate medical/psychiatric treatment
Create "super-spirituality" standard where physical symptoms are always spiritual

Discernment requires:

Mature community
Medical AND spiritual wisdom
Humility to admit when we don't know
Willingness to use ALL resources God provides

3. About Suffering and Holiness:

Ezequiel constantly fought idea that:

Prolonged suffering = more holiness
Seeking relief = lack of faith
Quick healing = less spiritual merit

Biblical truth:

God heals some instantly (paralytic at pool)
Others progressively (ten lepers)
Others He maintains thorn, but gives sufficient grace (Paul)
ALL are equally loved and valuable

4. About Spiritual Warfare:

Most Christians will never experience what Ezequiel experienced. And that's blessing, not deficiency.

Healthy spiritual warfare includes:

Prayer and fasting
Biblical knowledge
Strong community
BUT ALSO: medicine, therapy, rest, joy, healthy boundaries

Ezequiel isn't universal standard. He's specific witness of sufficient grace in extreme circumstance.

XVII. FINAL NOTE: EZEQUIEL AS PERSON

It's easy to transform him into symbol and forget the man.

Ezequiel ben-Avraham:

Liked fresh bread with honey (small luxury Miriam made for him)
Laughed when Simeon told bad Orthodox priest jokes
Cried easily in worship services
Was afraid of dark (cruel irony for someone who saw spiritual darkness)
Loved autumn (fresh air helped lungs)
Played flute badly, but played anyway
Dreamed of being simple copyist like father
Envied "normal" people sometimes
Felt guilty for envying
Constantly questioned God
Passionately loved God
Was flawed, broken, real

And precisely because of that, his testimony matters.

Because if Ezequiel—man under oppression since birth from generational vulnerability, perpetual sufferer, who fought
decades to appropriate victory Christ conquered at Cross—could say at end:

"Grace was sufficient"

Then there's hope for all of us.

Conclusion of Ezequiel's Profile

Ezequiel ben-Avraham lived 58 years.
48 of them under severe oppression.
10 in progressive freedom.
All of them sustained by grace.

His life doesn't answer all questions about suffering. But it proves fundamental truth:

When we are weak, He is strong.
When we cannot carry, He carries for us.
When night seems infinite, He is light that doesn't extinguish.

His final testimony wasn't of easy victory, but costly faithfulness.

And in end, that was enough.

More than enough.

Soli Deo Gloria.

End of Part I: Ezequiel ben-Avraham

[Continue to Part II: Johann "Johnny" Kestler →]

License Information:

This work is licensed under Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International (CC BY-SA 4.0).

You are free to:

Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format
Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material for any purpose, even commercially

Under the following terms:

Attribution — You must give appropriate credit to João Vitor Perazzolo (pen name: Johnny Kestler)
ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under
the same license

Author: João Vitor Perazzolo
Pen Name: Johnny Kestler
Year: 2024

JOHANN "JOHNNY" KESTLER

The Invisible Observer - Complete Character Profile

Created by: João Vitor Perazzolo (writing as Johnny Kestler)

Year: 2025

License: CC BY-SA 4.0

Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International

I. BASIC INFORMATION

Full Name: Johann "Johnny" Kestler

Meaning: Johann (God is gracious) - an irony he never fails to notice

Nicknames:

"Johnny" (Anglicization he adopted, more anonymous)

"Der Spiegel" / "The Mirror" (never used in front of him)

"The Silent One" (by those who knew him briefly)

Age in Main Narrative: 28-41 years (story spans 13 years, 1892-1905)

Year of Birth: 1864

Year of Death: 1912 (suicide by poisoning, 48 years old)

Place of Birth: Heidelberg, Grand Duchy of Baden, German Empire

Place of Death: Abandoned monastery in the Carpathians, Transylvania-Moldavia border

II. HISTORICAL AND GEOGRAPHICAL CONTEXT

The Setting: Germany and Eastern Europe, 1864-1912

Why this period?

1. Rise of German Rationalism: Era of scientific thought predominance, positivism, philosophical

materialism

2. Nascent Psychology: Wundt founds first experimental psychology laboratory (Leipzig, 1879) - Johnny

studies there

3. Tension Between Faith and Science: Cultural battle between religious tradition and scientific modernity

4. Communication Networks: Telegraph enables secret organizations (like the Fraternity) to operate

internationally

5. European Mobility: Travel between Germany and Eastern Europe by train possible, making Johnny's

mission viable

Heidelberg: The City of Formation (1864-1891)

Characteristics:

Prestigious university center

Academic tradition since 1386

Mixture of German romanticism and scientific rationalism

Intellectual but socially conservative community

Neckar River, medieval castle, atmosphere of ancient beauty and new thought

Importance for Johnny:

University of Heidelberg: where he studied philosophy, experimental psychology, medicine

Place where intellectual development flourished but emotional connection died

City that formed him as perfect instrument of observation

The Carpathian Region: The Mission Location (1892-1905)

Why Johnny was sent there:

Fraternity of the Vigilant had reports of "heretical activity"

Rumors about "The Marked One" reached through informant network

They needed scientific assessment, not just religious fanaticism

Johnny was perfect tool: educated German, emotional distance, analytical capacity

III. FAMILY HISTORY: THE ORIGIN OF EMPTINESS

The Kestler Family

Friedrich Kestler (Father, 1835-1879):

Professor of theology at University of Heidelberg

Rigorous Lutheran, cold intellectual

Believed in God as "ordering principle," not person

Treated son as intellectual project, not child

Premature death from stroke at 44

Last words to Johnny (15 years old): "Be useful. Feelings are obstacles."

Margarethe Kestler née Schmidt (Mother, 1840-1870):

Died when Johnny was 6 (childbirth complications, baby also died)

Johnny has only fragments of memory: soft hands, lullaby, lavender scent

Only source of emotional warmth in his life

Her death was foundational event: first emptiness

Childhood After Mother's Death (1870-1879)

Raised exclusively by father:

Rigorous education: Latin at 7, Greek at 9, philosophy at 11

Emotions treated as "noise in the system"

Punishment for crying: isolation in room until "regaining composure"

Development of dissociation as survival

The Defining Incident (1876, 12 years old)

Johnny found mother's diary in attic. Read about her love for him, hopes, dreams. Cried for first time in years.

Father found him:

"Johann, this is weakness. Your mother is dead. Crying doesn't bring her back. It only wastes energy that

could be used productively. Control yourself."

Something broke in that moment. Johnny stopped crying. And never genuinely cried again for the next 36 years.

Psychological Heritage

No violent trauma or extreme abuse occurred.

It was death by a thousand cuts: emotional validation consistently denied.

He learned: emotions are defects to be corrected.

He internalized: human value resides in utility, not in being.

IV. EDUCATION AND FORMATION (1879-1891)

University of Heidelberg (1882-1889)

Degrees:

Philosophy (1886) - Thesis on Kantian epistemology

Experimental Psychology (1889) - Study on objective perception vs. emotional distortion

Partial medical studies (did not complete, but advanced anatomical/physiological knowledge)

Academic Mentors:

Professor Wilhelm Brandt (1840-1895):

Experimental psychologist, studied with Wundt in Leipzig

Recognized in Johnny "rare absence of emotional bias"

Treated him as scientific instrument, not person - reinforced dissociation

Taught: "The ideal observer does not feel. Only registers."

Professor Klaus Reinhardt (1838-1890):

Philosopher, phenomenology specialist

Taught Johnny to "see phenomena as they are, not as we interpret them"

Only person who questioned Johnny's coldness: "You don't observe. You hide."

Johnny never forgot this. Never responded.

Skills Developed:

Clinical observation without emotional interpretation

Meticulous documentation

Ability to maintain multiple false identities

Languages: German (native), Latin, Greek, French, English + learned Russian, Romanian, Hungarian for

mission

Trained photographic memory

Minuscule, precise handwriting (entire notebooks in minimal space)

The Emptiness Crystallizes (1885-1891)

Attempts at Connection (all failed):

Anna Weber (1886):

Study colleague, interested in him

Johnny tried to "conduct appropriate relationship"

Felt nothing. Absolutely nothing.

She noticed: "You look at me as if I were a mathematical problem."

He responded honestly: "I don't know how to look any other way."

She cried. He clinically noted her reaction that night.

Friendship with Thomas Müller (1887-1889):

Only one Johnny considered "friend"

Thomas tried to make him laugh, feel, live

Johnny participated socially but felt like actor memorizing lines

Thomas gave up: "Johnny, you're dead inside. I don't know how to reach you."

Johnny agreed: "You are correct. Sorry for wasting your time."

The Recognition (1890)

Johnny, at 26, accepted truth:

It wasn't a phase. It was permanent.

It wasn't repression. It was absence.

He didn't need to be cured. He needed to be used.

Personal diary entry (1890):

"I am broken instrument that functions perfectly for specific function.

I don't feel. Therefore, I don't distort.

I don't care. Therefore, I don't lie to myself.

I don't love. Therefore, I have no conflicts of interest.

I am pure observer. I need to find who needs this."

V. THE FRATERNITY OF THE VIGILANT (1891-1892)

The Recruitment

How it happened:

Professor Brandt had secret connections with the Fraternity. He mentioned Johnny:

"I have exceptional student. German, educated, completely objective. Has no emotional loyalties. Perfect for

investigative work."

First Contact (Summer 1891):

Fraternity representative (using false name "Father Augustin") sought out Johnny:

"Herr Kestler, we need someone with your specific abilities. To evaluate phenomena that others would

consider with religious or emotional prejudice. You would be generously compensated."

Johnny: "What phenomenon?"

"Possible heresy in Eastern Europe. Converted Jew claiming demonic oppression. Could be fraud, insanity,

or... something genuine. We need to know."

Johnny: "Why me?"

"Because you won't be seduced by his charisma, nor repelled by prejudice. You'll just see what's there."

Johnny accepted. Not for money. Not for ideology. But because he finally had clear function.

Fraternity Training (Fall-Winter 1891)

What he learned:

Fraternity history (edited version, not mentioning murders)

Theology of "church purification"

Infiltration and camouflage techniques

How to maintain false identities for prolonged periods

Signs of genuine possession vs. fraud vs. mental illness

What he did NOT initially know:

The Fraternity killed "heretics"

Final objective was not study but eventual elimination

He was being used as assassination precursor

Irony: Johnny, who felt no empathy, was protected from participating in extreme violence precisely because

Fraternity saw him as "observer too pure for execution"

The Mission (March 1892)

Instructions:

1. Travel to Carpathian region

2. Locate Ezequiel ben-Avraham

3. Observe him for minimum 6 months

4. Document everything: behavior, patterns, manifestations

5. Evaluate: fraud, insanity, or genuine phenomenon

6. Send report to determine Fraternity action

Equipment:

Money sufficient for 2 years

False letters of introduction (merchant, scribe, etc.)

Notation notebooks (12, each coded)

Basic medical instruments (thermometer, stethoscope, etc.)

Johnny departed without emotion. Just function to fulfill.

He didn't know he would find something his framework couldn't process.

VI. THE OBSERVATION YEARS (1892-1898)

Arrival and First Location (March-April 1892)

Initial Strategy:

Installed himself in neighboring village as "German scribe traveling for work"

Quickly learned local Romanian and Russian (already had foundation)

Made contacts with merchants, priests, doctors of region

Collected rumors about "The Marked One" without revealing specific interest

First Observation of Ezequiel (April 15, 1892):

Johnny saw him from distance, walking with difficulty through village street.

Clinical notation:

"Subject: Man, approx. 45 years, appears 60+

Height: 1.75m, estimated weight: 55kg (severe malnutrition)

Gait: slow, slight spinal curvature, favors left leg

Pallor: extreme, deep dark circles, signs of chronic illness

Observation: subject stopped to help fallen child.

Movement visibly cost him. Created delay in his path. Did it anyway.

Note: behavior inconsistent with self-preservation expected in chronic patient."

Decision: Gradual approach under multiple identities.

Johnny's Disguises (1892-1898)

1. Hermann, the Traveling Merchant (used periodically):

Sold fabrics, spices, small objects

Visited village every 2-3 months

Allowed brief, casual conversations with Ezequiel

"Hello, my friend! How's your health?" (always observing reaction)

2. Father Christoph, Itinerant Monk (used occasionally):

Claimed personal pilgrimage

Attended Orthodox church where Ezequiel went

Observed him during prayers

Never spoke directly in this identity (avoid deep theological discussion that would reveal expertise)

3. Dimitri, Romanian Scribe (fixed identity in neighboring village):

Official "work" justifying prolonged presence in region

Copied documents, letters for semi-literate people

Had access to correspondence, local records

Read Ezequiel's letters to Simeon (without stealing, only when brought for copying)

4. The Unnamed Hermit (1895-1898):

Built small cabin in mountain overlooking village

Known as "strange hermit who doesn't bother anyone"

Distance observation with binoculars

No one suspected he was same man as other identities

Documentation Structure

Notebook System:

Notebook A (Direct Observations): Daily record, clinical, without interpretation

Notebook B (Conversations): Dialogues transcribed from memory, word for word

Notebook C (Clinical Analysis): Attempts to explain by medical/psychological frameworks

Notebook D (Social Context): Information about community, Simeon, surrounding people

Notebook E (Inexplicable): Observations that don't fit scientific frameworks

Personal Notebook (not coded, hidden): Notes on own reactions - increasingly disturbing

Handwriting:

Minuscule, precise, no waste

Systematic abbreviations

Occasional anatomical drawings

Stains (coffee? tears in final years? Ambiguous)

VII. KEY OBSERVATION MOMENTS

MOMENT 1: The Beggar (July 1892)

Johnny, disguised as merchant, observed:

Ezequiel sitting outside home, visibly exhausted. Beggar approaches, asking for food.

Ezequiel enters (Johnny observes through window), divides his own bread (only one he had), gives to beggar.

Beggar: "God bless you!"

Ezequiel: "He already has. That's why I can give to you."

Johnny notes:

"Subject gave last food. Self-destructive behavior?

No. Face showed... peace? Inadequate term. Absence of internal conflict.

How does someone in constant pain (observable) give last food without hesitation?

Framework: pathological altruism? Insufficient. No pattern of performative martyrdom.

He simply... gave. As if it were obvious."

MOMENT 2: First Direct Contact (September 1892)

Johnny, as Hermann, trips "accidentally" near Ezequiel.

Ezequiel helps him up. Johnny observes face up close for first time.

"Thank you," Johnny murmurs (German accent slightly perceptible).

Ezequiel: "Are you hurt?"

Johnny: "No. I'm fine."

Ezequiel smiles - tired, small: "Then we're both lying politely. You carry something heavy. Don't need to talk

about it. Just... may God be with you."

Johnny freezes internally. How did he—?

Notes that night:

"Subject demonstrated unusual perception. Detected 'weight' I carry.

How? Body language? Expression? Impossible - I control both rigorously.

Possibilities:

1. Luck/guessing

2. Extreme psychological sensitivity

3. Other (I have no framework)

Effect on me: discomfort. Not physical. I have no name for this.

First time in years someone 'saw' me beyond surface.

Note: avoid close future contact until I process this."

MOMENT 3: The Observed Prayer (December 1892)

Johnny, as Father Christoph, observes Ezequiel praying in Orthodox church.

Ezequiel is alone (he thinks), kneeling. Body tense with pain. But remains.

Johnny hears (without wanting to invade, but church has echo):

"...I know I don't understand Your purpose. I know it hurts. I know I'm tired. But I trust You don't waste

anything. Even this. Even... this."

Voice breaks. Silence. Then:

"Thank You for being here. It's enough."

Johnny leaves silently.

Notes:

"Witnessed private prayer. Shouldn't have heard, but I heard.

Subject thanks in midst of visible suffering.

It's not masochism - tone wasn't of pleasure in pain.

It's not resignation - tone wasn't of defeat.

It was... what?

End notation. Cannot process."

MOMENT 4: The Healing Johnny Witnessed (March 1893)

Johnny followed Ezequiel (at distance) to neighboring village. Ezequiel was called to pray for oppressed

woman.

Johnny observed through window (hidden position):

Ezequiel, clearly exhausted, prayed for hours. At one point, seemed to feel extreme pain - clutched chest, sweat,

but continued praying.

Woman began screaming, then fainting, then waking... different. Light. Free.

Ezequiel collapsed. Simeon (Johnny identifies him) took him home.

Notes:

"Witnessed phenomenon. Woman before: extreme agitation, pattern consistent with hysteria or possession.

Woman after: complete calm, restored coherence.

E.: suffered intensely during process. As if... absorbing? Imprecise term.

Possible explanations:

1. Suggestion/collective hypnosis - INSUFFICIENT (change was real, lasting)

2. Psychosomatic disorder in both - INSUFFICIENT (improbable synchronicity)

3. Phenomenon outside known frameworks - ???

Personally: felt something in environment. Pressure? Weight? Don't know how to describe.

For first time, I question if materialist frameworks are adequate."

MOMENT 5: Johnny Is Seen (June 1893)

Johnny, as Dimitri, worked in neighboring village. Ezequiel came to deliver letter for copying.

Casual moment. But when he handed letter, Ezequiel stopped. Looked Johnny in eyes - really looked.

"You... have we met before?"

Johnny (perfect control): "I don't believe so, sir. I'm new to region."

Ezequiel continues looking: "Sorry. I have impression of... never mind. Thank you for the work."

Leaves. But looks back once.

Johnny notes:

"PROBLEM: Subject may be starting to connect identities.

Logically impossible - I made no mistakes.

But he 'felt' something.

Need to reduce frequency of Hermann (merchant) and Dimitri.

Focus on distance observation.

Personal note: when he looked at me, I felt... exposed.

Absurd. There's nothing to expose. I'm empty.

But feeling persisted."

MOMENT 6: The Night of Confrontation (1895)

Johnny didn't directly witness (occurred in closed monastery), but obtained details later through disguised

conversations with participants.

Documented meticulously. Entire Notebook E (Inexplicable) dedicated to this event.

Tried to explain by psychological frameworks: collective suggestion, group hysteria phenomenon, etc.

No framework closed.

Notes (Personal Notebook):

"If what they report is true - and multiple independent sources confirm consistent details - then:

1. Materialism is incomplete, or

2. There are layers of reality that science hasn't yet reached, or

3. I'm being systematically deceived (unlikely - I'm very cautious), or

4. There is real spiritual dimension.

Option 4 terrifies me. Because if it's real, then everything I built

my identity as objective observer, my dissociation as strength - is sandcastle before tide.

But intellectual integrity forces me to consider: evidence points to option 4."

MOMENT 7: Decision Not to Send Report (December 1895)

Johnny was supposed to send final report to Fraternity after 1895 breakthrough.

He sat to write. Three attempts:

Attempt 1 (clinical, objective):

"Subject presents phenomenon consistent with genuine spiritual oppression.

Manifestations not explainable by known pathology.

Recommendation: does not constitute threat. Elimination would be error."

Tore it up. Too cold. Could be ignored.

Attempt 2 (emotional - surprisingly):

"Ezequiel ben-Avraham is most upright man I've known.

You have no right to judge him."

Tore immediately. This wasn't him. Where did it come from?

Attempt 3 (honest):

"Cannot complete mission. Evidence contradicts initial premises.

Subject is not heretic. He is witness to something real I don't comprehend.

Eliminating him would destroy something precious.

Will not send exact location. Consider mission terminated."

Burned before sending.

Notes (Personal Notebook):

"Disobeyed direct order for first time in life.

Not by emotion (still don't properly feel).

But by... integrity? Recognition of value?

Don't know how to name.

Just know: cannot be responsible for his death.

This means something in me changed.

Don't know if this is good."

VIII. THE INTERMEDIATE PERIOD (1896-1903)

Johnny could have left. But he didn't.

He remained. Continued observing. No longer for mission, but for... he didn't know what.

Gradual Changes in Johnny

1896:

Still documents clinically

But adds "Personal Reflections" section in notebooks

First time admitting he doesn't have answers

1897:

First moment where he doesn't note something immediately - just observes

Discovers he can witness without analyzing

Disturbing, but also... liberating?

1898:

Ezequiel marries Miriam

Johnny observes ceremony from distance

Notes: "He found joy. Don't know why this brings me... satisfaction? Not right word. But something."

1899-1902:

Less frequent observation (they deserve privacy - Johnny's first genuine ethical thought)

But maintains distance monitoring

Documents moments of joy between Ezequiel and Miriam

Note: these notations are different - softer, less clinical

1903:

Miriam's death

Johnny observes Ezequiel collapse

For first time in 30+ years, Johnny feels something like pain

Cannot note for three days

When he finally notes:

"M. died. E. is destroyed.

I... don't know how to process what I feel.

It's not my pain. But it echoes.

As if observing others' suffering for so long finally cracked something in me.

I don't like this. But also can't stop."

The Encounter with Hieronymus/Moishe (1903-1904)

Johnny observed Moishe's conversion process from distance.

Saw violent man deconstructed by Ezequiel's patient love.

Notes:

"If E. can redeem someone like M. - professional assassin who killed in God's name -

then perhaps... perhaps there's hope even for empty observer like me.

No. I shouldn't think like this. I'm not redemption project.

I'm witness. Just witness.

(But for first time, I wish to be more.)"

IX. THE FINAL PERIOD (1904-1905)

Final Vigil

Spring 1905:

Johnny learned (through local information networks) that Ezequiel was dying.

For first time in 13 years, broke protocol: approached directly.

Not as disguise. As himself. Johann Kestler.

The Only Real Encounter (April 10, 1905)

Johnny entered Ezequiel's room. Simeon was there, initially suspicious.

Johnny: "My name is Johann Kestler. I am... was... observer sent by Fraternity of the Vigilant. I spent 13 years

documenting Ezequiel's life. He never knew."

Simeon, furious: "You are—"

Ezequiel (weak voice): "Simeon. Let him speak."

Johnny, for first time without perfect control: "I came... to ask forgiveness. And thank you."

Ezequiel: "Forgiveness for what?"

Johnny: "For observing you without consent. For invading your life. For... I don't know. It seems wrong."

Ezequiel smiles: "I knew."

Johnny freezes: "How?"

Ezequiel: "Didn't know details. But felt presence. Not hostile. Just... present. Thought it was imagination. Or

angel. Or God showing me I was never alone."

Johnny sits, trembling (first time body betrays internal emotion): "I'm not an angel."

Ezequiel: "No. You're man. Man carrying emptiness as large as my suffering. I saw that."

Johnny: "You... saw me?"

Ezequiel: "Always. And I prayed for you. 'Lord, whoever is observing in the shadows, be with him too.'"

Something breaks in Johnny. No tears yet. But deep crack.

Johnny: "Why didn't you expose me?"

Ezequiel: "Because you needed to observe. And I needed witness. Even invisible one."

Long silence.

Johnny: "I came to thank you because... you showed me something my frameworks couldn't process. Something

real. Don't know if it's God. But it's... truth beyond what science reaches."

Ezequiel: "And that scares you."

Johnny: "Yes."

Ezequiel: "But you came anyway. That's courage, Johann."

First time in decades someone uses his true name with kindness.

Ezequiel: "Will you preserve my story?"

Johnny: "Already preserved. Every word. Every moment. 13 years in notebooks."

Ezequiel: "Then my life wasn't waste. Someone saw. Thank you."

Johnny cannot respond. Only nods.

Last Days (April 11-15, 1905)

Johnny remained in village. Kept vigil at distance (old habit).

When Ezequiel died (April 15), Johnny was outside window. Heard last words.

"Grace was sufficient."

And then, silence.

Johnny felt - physically felt - something leave the room. Weight that had always been there, disappeared.

Notes (hand trembling):

"He's gone. And something in me went with him.

For first time in 13 years, I'm completely alone.

No. For first time, I FEEL that I'm alone.

The difference is terrifying."

X. THE FINAL YEARS (1905-1912)

The Compilation Work (1905-1911)

Purpose Found:

Johnny realized: he had 13 years of documentation. Thousands of pages. Ezequiel's life preserved with

precision no one else could have achieved.

This was his legacy. Only existential purpose that made sense.

Three Writing Phases

PHASE 1: "Clinical Records - Case E." (1905-1906)

Approach:

Purely scientific, objective

Attempt to explain Ezequiel by psychological/medical frameworks

Cold analysis of symptoms, patterns, behaviors

Result:

340-page document

Meticulously organized

Honest conclusion: "Materialist frameworks are inadequate to explain totality of observed phenomenon."

Final excerpt:

"After 13 years of systematic observation, I must conclude subject

presented phenomenon transcending conventional pathological explanations.

Not for lack of investigative rigor, but for evidence that

consistently pointed to non-material dimension of reality.

As scientist, this disturbs me profoundly.

As witness, I cannot deny what I saw."

PHASE 2: "Ezequiel ben-Avraham: Complete Chronology" (1907-1910)

Approach:

Compilation of everything: his diaries, testimonies, own observations

Precise chronological organization

Minimal interpretation - let facts speak

Obsession: Johnny worked on this 12-16 hours daily for 3 years.

Reconstructed entire conversations from memory

Drew maps of places where Ezequiel walked

Preserved even seemingly insignificant details (type of bread he ate, texture of his cough, sky color on

important days)

Why?

Notes (1908):

"If I don't preserve this - every detail, every nuance - who will?

Simeon will write with love, but lose objectivity.

Community will remember with mythology, but lose humanity.

I saw the man. The real man. In all his pain, beauty, contradiction.

I must preserve this. It's all I can give."

Result:

890-page masterpiece

So detailed later readers felt they were there

But strangely cold - as if author wasn't present

Last line: "This is the life of Ezequiel ben-Avraham. I witnessed. I recorded. Now I preserve."

PHASE 3: "Final Notes of an Observer" (1911)

Approach:

First time writing about himself

Personal document, never intended for publication

First person, vulnerable, honest

What happened:

Johnny, at 47, after completing chronology, had collapse.

Not physical. Emotional.

During 3 years focusing obsessively on Ezequiel, avoided processing what was happening to himself.

Now, without project to hide behind...

The floodgates opened.

Writing Process (March-October 1911)

Johnny wrote frantically, without structure, without control.

Pages stained (tears? drink? both?).

Handwriting deteriorating - from precise to trembling.

Confessional, chaotic, raw.

Excerpts from "Final Notes":

MARCH 1911

"Finished chronology. Ezequiel is preserved.

But I... what am I now?

Spent 13 years observing him. Then 6 years compiling him.

19 years of my life dedicated to man who barely knew I existed.

Why?

It wasn't mission - I abandoned that in 1895.

It wasn't scientific curiosity - transcended that long ago.

It was... what?

Love? Ridiculous term. Don't know how to love. Never knew.

But something. Something I have no name for."

APRIL 1911

"Reread my old notebooks. 1892. When it all began.

Who was that man? Johann Kestler, cold observer, dissociated, empty.

Who am I now?

Don't know. The person I was died sometime during these 19 years.

But what was born in its place?

I'm not like Ezequiel. Don't have his faith.

I'm not like Simeon. Don't have his capacity to love.

I'm... something intermediate. Neither dead nor alive. Neither cold nor capable of complete warmth.

Monstrosity. Creature trapped between states."

MAY 1911

"Realized something terrifying today:

Ezequiel didn't save me. He broke me.

For decades, I lived perfectly in dissociation.

It was functional. It was useful. It was PEACEFUL.

Then he appeared - or I found him - and showed me something

I shouldn't have seen: full humanity. Suffering without fleeing.

Love without conditions. Faith without logic.

And now I can't return to emptiness.

But also can't advance to what he had.

I'm trapped. And it's unbearable.

I hate him for this.

No. Lie. I don't hate.

Love? Term still doesn't close.

Just... feel. And feeling is agony."

JUNE 1911

"Dreamed of Ezequiel yesterday.

Don't remember last time I dreamed.

In dream, he sat under tree. Healthy. At peace.

Looked at me and said: 'Johann, are you still observing?'

I answered: 'Don't know how to do anything else.'

He smiled: 'Maybe it's time to live.'

Woke crying. For first time in 35 years, I cried truly.

Don't know what to do with this."

JULY 1911

"Read New Testament today. First time seriously.

Ezequiel quoted constantly. Wanted to understand.

Found this in 2 Corinthians 12:9:

'My grace is sufficient, for my power is made perfect in weakness.'

Ezequiel lived this. Until last breath.

But for me... don't know. Don't feel this grace.

Maybe because I never asked?

Maybe because I don't believe?

Maybe because I'm not loved like he was?

Or maybe... maybe it's here, and I simply don't recognize it.

After all, Ezequiel prayed for me for 13 years.

'Whoever is in the shadows, be with him.'

If God hears prayers... then it was heard.

But then, why do I still feel empty?"

AUGUST 1911

"Tried to pray today.

Didn't work.

Knelt. Opened mouth. Nothing.

How does someone speak to God when they don't know if they believe?

Ezequiel said: 'Just be honest.'

Tried again:

'If you exist... don't know if you exist. But Ezequiel believed. And he was

wiser than me. So... if you exist... don't know what to ask.

Just... help. Whatever that means.'

Silence.

But different silence. Not empty. Just... quiet.

Don't know if this is something or nothing."

SEPTEMBER 1911

"Went to Ezequiel's grave today.

First time since burial.

Stayed there for hours. In silence.

And then, I spoke. Out loud. Like idiot:

'Ezequiel... you destroyed me. Don't know if that was cruel or kind.

But you showed me something I cannot unsee.

Spent entire life avoiding feeling. And you forced me to feel.

Not directly. Just... existing. Being what you were.

I hate you for this.

I love you for this.

Don't know which is truth.

Thank you for letting me observe.

Thank you for praying for me.

Thank you for seeing me when no one else saw.

You said grace was sufficient for you.

I hope it's sufficient for me too.

Because I don't know what else to do.'

Cried there. Much. Like I never cried.

And for first time in 47 years... felt something like peace.

Small. Fragile. But real."

OCTOBER 1911

"Finished this document.

Don't know for whom. Maybe no one. Maybe God. Maybe just for me.

Conclusions:

1. Ezequiel ben-Avraham was real man who lived something real.

2. His faith wasn't illusion. It was anchor in something beyond visible.

3. His grace... touched even me. Empty observer. Shadow of man.

4. Don't know if I have faith. But I know I can no longer deny possibility.

5. Something changed in me. Don't know if it's redemption. But it's change.

Will preserve his documents in monastery in Moldavia.

Will leave instructions for them to be found at right time.

And then... don't know.

Maybe live. As he suggested in dream.

Maybe just exist until I die.

Maybe still discover what 'sufficient grace' means for man like me.

Johann Kestler

48 years

Still lost, but no longer completely empty

October, 1911"

XI. THE DEATH (1912)

The Last Months

January-March 1912:

Johnny tried to "live normally."

Rented small room in nearby village

Tried casual conversations with people

Tried... existing without defined project

Discovered: he didn't know how.

Notes (last notebook, March 1912):

"Tried. Really tried.

But don't know how to be normal person.

Observing was my function. Without it, I'm... nothing.

Ezequiel had faith to anchor himself. I don't have.

Ezequiel had community. I pushed everyone away.

Ezequiel had clear purpose. Mine died with him.

It's not depression. It's logical recognition:

Completed function. Work is preserved. There's no next chapter.

I'm... tired. For first time, I understand Ezequiel's tiredness.

Difference: he had reason to continue. I don't."

The Decision

April 1912:

Johnny returned to abandoned monastery where he stored documents.

Reviewed everything one last time. Ensured it was preserved, protected.

Wrote final letter to "whoever finds this":

"To whoever finds these documents:

My name is Johann Kestler. I observed Ezequiel ben-Avraham for 13 years.

These notebooks contain his life. Every detail. Preserved by observer

who didn't have capacity to emotionally distort.

Use them well. Tell his story. Not with mythology, but with truth.

He deserves that.

As for me... I don't matter. I was just instrument. Function fulfilled.

If Ezequiel's God exists - and increasingly I believe He does -

I ask only: let me rest. I'm very tired.

And if You find Ezequiel wherever he is... tell him:

'The invisible witness thanks you.'

Johann Kestler

April 15, 1912"

The Final Night (April 15, 1912 - exactly 7 years after Ezequiel's death)

Johnny prepared poison (medical knowledge applied).

Sat in same room where he stored documents.

Opened New Testament to marked page - 2 Corinthians 12:9.

Last notation (scribbled, nearly illegible):

"Ezequiel said: 'Grace was sufficient.'

Don't know if it was sufficient for me.

But I want to believe.

If there's something beyond... see you there.

If there isn't... at least I won't be trapped anymore.

Forgive me."

Drank poison.

Died in minutes.

Found three days later by monks who returned temporarily.

Buried in monastery cemetery. Simple headstone:

JOHANN KESTLER

1864-1912

"He saw. He recorded. He witnessed."

XII. LEGACY AND PRESERVED DOCUMENTS

What Johnny Left

Complete Documentation:

1. 12 Coded Notebooks (1892-1905): Direct observations of Ezequiel

2. "Clinical Records - Case E." (340 pages): Scientific analysis

3. "Ezequiel ben-Avraham: Complete Chronology" (890 pages): Historiographic masterpiece

4. "Final Notes of an Observer" (187 pages): Personal confession

5. Final Personal Notebook (67 pages): Last months of life

Discovery

Found in 1923 by scholars who heard rumors of "German archive about Carpathian saint."

Initially considered fraud (detail level was "impossible").

Cross-verification with:

Simeon's biography

Community records

Ezequiel's diary fragments

Conclusion: Authentic. And extraordinarily precise.

Impact of Johnny's Documents

For Historians:

Invaluable primary source

Unprecedented detail

External (non-hagiographic) perspective of religious figure

For Theologians:

Evidence of spiritual phenomenon documented by skeptic

Testimony of gradual transformation (Johnny's own)

Questioning of purely materialist frameworks

For Psychologists:

Case of extreme functional dissociation

Example of slow and painful emotional reconnection

Study of participant observation taken to extreme

For Common Readers:

Story within story

Silent witness who became part of narrative

Proof that even "dead inside" observer can be touched

XIII. THE UNRESOLVED QUESTION

Was Johnny Saved?

Debate among scholars:

Position 1 - Yes:

Prayed (genuine attempts in 1911)

Recognized own insufficiency

Trusted (even if fragilely) in something beyond himself

Last letter shows embryonic faith

Ezequiel prayed for him for 13 years - these prayers count

Position 2 - No:

Never had clear conversion

Final suicide suggests despair, not faith

Intellectual recognition isn't saving faith

Remained fundamentally distant until end

Position 3 - Mystery:

Only God knows heart's state in final moment

Grace operates in mysterious ways

Johnny was work in progress interrupted by own hand

Judgment doesn't belong to us

What We Know

He changed. Profoundly.

Ezequiel reached him where no one else could.

He died still struggling, still questioning.

And perhaps that, too, is form of faith.

XIV. PHYSICAL APPEARANCE AND MANNERISMS

Appearance Through the Years

Youth (1864-1891):

Height: 1.82m

Build: thin but not fragile

Hair: dark blond, always rigorously combed

Eyes: gray-blue, intense but empty ("like clean glass")

Face: angular, without emotional marks (never frowned or smiled)

Clothing: always appropriate for context, never flashy

General impression: beautiful in disturbing way - perfection without life

Observation Period (1892-1905):

Maintained controlled appearance

Disguises required changes: false beards, local clothes, altered posture

But eyes remained: empty, observing

Minimal aging (absence of emotional tension preserves face)

Final Years (1906-1912):

Visible deterioration after Ezequiel's death

Hair prematurely whitening

Reduced weight (forgot to eat)

Eyes different: no longer empty, but... haunted

Less erect posture

First time in life: looked tired

Characteristic Mannerisms

Physical Patterns:

Near-complete immobility when observing

Controlled, imperceptible breathing

Rare blinking (training to miss nothing)

Economical, precise movements

Never gestures when speaking

Vocal Patterns:

Neutral voice, without emotional inflection

Native German, but multilingual fluent

Accent adapts to context (conscious skill)

Long silences before responding

Never interrupts

Social Patterns:

Avoids prolonged eye contact (gives discomfort to others)

Maintains specific physical distance (1.5m - calculated to seem normal without intimacy)

Smiles only when necessary for disguise (never spontaneously)

Handshake: correct, no extra force, no warmth

Personal Habits:

Writes compulsively (always has hidden notebook)

Eats functionally (fuel, not pleasure)

Sleeps little (4-5 hours, not from insomnia but from not needing more)

Impeccable hygiene (part of control)

Collects nothing except information

Changes Post-Ezequiel (1906-1912)

Signs of Control Deterioration:

Hands begin trembling (first physical sign of emotion)

Forgets to maintain posture (body relaxes involuntarily)

Cries alone (no longer controls)

Occasionally laughs when reading something of Ezequiel's (genuine laughter, strange, painful)

Talks to himself (converses with dead Ezequiel)

XV. DEEP PSYCHOLOGY

Primary Defense Structure

Dissociation as Identity:

Johnny doesn't use dissociation - he IS crystallized dissociation.

Crucial difference:

Normal person dissociates temporarily under trauma

Johnny built entire personality on permanent dissociated state

Why it worked:

Eliminated emotional pain

Maximized perceptive clarity

Gave social function (observer)

Allowed survival without vulnerability

Why it broke:

Ezequiel didn't attack defense - simply existed beyond it

Didn't try to "cure" Johnny - just saw him

Sustained presence of authentic humanity eroded dissociation slowly

Like water on stone: not force, but persistence

The Central Paradox of Johnny

Irresolvable Contradiction:

Johnny wanted:

1. To remain empty (safe, functional, painless)

2. To be real (connected, alive, human)

Ezequiel showed that #2 was possible.

But reaching it required destroying #1.

Johnny was trapped between states for 19 years.

Death was escape - not from cowardice, but from impossibility of integration.

Relationship with God (Unresolved)

Trajectory:

1892-1895: God doesn't exist (materialist certainty)

1895-1903: Maybe God exists (disturbing evidence)

1903-1905: God probably exists (diminishing resistance)

1905-1911: God exists but doesn't reach me (despair)

1911-1912: God exists and maybe reaches me, but it's too late (partial surrender)

Never reached: God exists and loves me (full faith)

But reached: God exists and Ezequiel believed that, and that has to mean something (vicarious faith?)

XVI. NARRATIVE FUNCTION

Why Johnny Exists in Ezequiel's Story

Function 1 - Objective Witness:

Validates Ezequiel's experience through non-hagiographic source

Precise documentation preserves history

External perspective adds credibility

Function 2 - Thematic Contrast:

Ezequiel = suffering with connection

Johnny = absence of suffering through disconnection

Which is more human? More desirable?

Function 3 - Inverted Mirror:

Ezequiel saw too much (spiritually)

Johnny saw too much (clinically)

Both paid price for expanded vision

Function 4 - Ambiguous Redemption:

Not everyone is "saved" clearly

Some die still struggling

Grace operates even when result is ambiguous

Function 5 - Meta-Narrative:

Johnny as "author" of documents creates additional layer

Reader questions: how much of what we read is Johnny's filter?

But he's clearest filter possible - that's why it works

XVII. MATERIAL FOR THE WRITER

Obligatory Scenes (Moments that MUST appear)

1. First observation of Ezequiel (April 1892)

2. First accidental contact (September 1892)

3. Johnny witnesses healing/deliverance (1893)

4. Decision not to send report (1895)

5. Observation of Ezequiel and Miriam (1898)

6. Miriam's death and Johnny's reaction (1903)

7. Real encounter with dying Ezequiel (April 1905)

8. Ezequiel's death witnessed from outside (April 15, 1905)

9. Johnny writing "Final Notes" (1911)

10. Johnny's suicide (April 15, 1912)

Optional Scenes (Writer decides)

Johnny's childhood flashbacks

Recruitment process by Fraternity

Specific documentation moments

Interactions with Simeon (if Simeon discovers Johnny before end)

Johnny's prayer attempts

Visit to Ezequiel's grave

Open Questions (For Writer to Resolve)

1. Does Simeon know about Johnny?

Option A: Discovers only at end (dramatic surprise)

Option B: Suspects throughout years (growing tension)

Option C: Never discovers (Johnny remains complete shadow)

2. Do other characters see Johnny?

How much social presence does he have?

Does anyone else suspect?

How invisible can he really be?

3. Tone of Johnny's narration:

First person (intense, limited)

Intimate third person (balanced)

Diary format (fragmented, authentic)

Mixed (different sections, different styles)

4. Does Johnny leave hints of transformation or maintain control until final break?

Gradual change visible in notebooks?

Or sudden change only at end?

5. Supernatural element:

Does Johnny witness something undeniable that breaks materialism?

Or does he remain always at margin, seeing effects but never cause?

XVIII. FINAL THEOLOGICAL NOTES

The Mystery of Johnny's Salvation

Don't resolve this definitively.

Leave ambiguous because:

1. Reflects reality (we don't always know someone's spiritual state)

2. Provokes reflection in reader

3. Respects complexity of human journeys

4. Honors mystery of grace

But give hints of hope:

Ezequiel's prayer for him (13 years)

Genuine change (even if incomplete)

Recognition of truth beyond himself

Last letter showing fragile surrender

And hints of despair:

Suicide (interruption of process)

Never clear profession of faith

Permanence of doubt until end

Inability to integrate experience

Let reader decide - but lean slightly toward hope.

Because if there's anything Ezequiel's story teaches: grace is sufficient even for the most broken.

And Johnny was very, very broken.

XIX. FINAL WORD

Johann "Johnny" Kestler was man who spent entire life observing others live.

Until he found someone whose life was impossible to ignore.

Ezequiel didn't save him in traditional sense.

But broke him in redemptive sense.

Johnny remained confused, divided, struggling until last moment.

But died different from how he was born.

And perhaps, just perhaps, that is enough.

XX. CHARACTERISTIC QUOTATIONS

About Observation

"Seeing clearly requires being dead inside."

"I don't observe life. I am absence observing presence."

About Ezequiel

"He is phenomenon my frameworks cannot contain."

"Subject behaves inconsistently with self-preservation expected in chronic patient. This disturbs me more

than any supernatural claim."

About Himself

"I am not person. I am function that forgot to stop."

"I prefer emptiness. It was simpler."

"I am broken instrument that functions perfectly for specific function."

About Change

"For 35 years I didn't cry. Then I read one sentence he wrote, and something in me... cracked."

"I thought consciousness would liberate me. Instead, it became most sophisticated cage I ever built."

About Faith

"Don't know if I believe. But cannot deny anymore."

"If grace reaches even shadows, then perhaps there's hope. Even for me."

"Ezequiel prayed for me for 13 years. If prayers are heard... then I was heard. Even if I don't feel it."

Last Line Ever Written

"Maybe grace is sufficient even for shadows."

XXI. APPENDIX: LETTER TO READERS

This section would be included in preserved manuscripts, written by Simeon after Johnny's death:

To Those Who Will Read This Story in Years to Come:

I am Father Simeon Petrescu. I knew Ezequiel ben-Avraham for 26 years, and discovered Johann Kestler only

in final week of Ezequiel's life.

When I found Johann's documents after his death, I was torn:

Part of me was furious - he invaded my friend's life, observed without permission, documented suffering like

scientist studying specimen.

But another part... understood.

Because reading his 13 years of observations, I saw something I missed:

Johann Kestler loved Ezequiel ben-Avraham.

Not in way most people love. He didn't feel it warmly. Didn't express it normally.

But he gave 19 years of his life to one man - 13 observing, 6 compiling.

He documented every moment with precision no one else could achieve.

He preserved Ezequiel's story when it would have been lost.

And in process... something in him changed.

The man who started observing in 1892 was empty. Clinical. Dead inside.

The man who died in 1912 was broken. Confused. But... human.

Was he saved? I don't know. Only God knows.

But I know this: Ezequiel reached him.

The same man who liberated so many from oppression,

The same man who chose love in midst of suffering,

The same man who prayed for enemies and strangers...

...reached into shadow where Johann hid and touched him.

And isn't that, in itself, form of grace?

So to those who read this:

Don't judge Johann too harshly. He did best he could with tools he had.

Don't romanticize him either. He was broken man who died broken.

But learn from him:

Consciousness without heart is prison.

Observation without participation is death.

And grace... grace reaches even into darkest shadows.

Even to German scientist who thought he was just documenting.

Even to man who didn't know how to feel.

Even to observer who, in end, became part of story.

If Johann is wherever Ezequiel is, I imagine my friend saying:

"Johann, you came. You finally stopped observing and started participating. Welcome home."

And I hope - I truly hope - that's what happened.

Father Simeon Petrescu

Monastery of St. Nicholas, Moldavia

Spring, 1913

XXII. CONCLUSION

Johann "Johnny" Kestler lived 48 years.

35 of them emotionally dead.

13 of them observing someone truly alive.

6 of them trying to understand what he witnessed.

All of them preserved in notebooks with minuscule, precise handwriting.

His life doesn't answer all questions about consciousness, emotion, salvation.

But it proves one fundamental truth:

Even the emptiest observer can be touched by authentic presence.

Even the coldest analyst can crack when confronted with genuine love.

Even the most dissociated soul can begin to wake.

His final testimony wasn't of easy victory, but of costly faithfulness to something he barely understood.

And in the end, perhaps that was sufficient.

More than sufficient.

Soli Deo Gloria.

END OF JOHANN "JOHNNY" KESTLER CHARACTER PROFILE

Document Information:

Author: João Vitor Perazzolo (writing as Johnny Kestler)

Created: 2025

License: CC BY-SA 4.0

Attribution: This work is licensed under Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International. You

are free to share and adapt this material with proper attribution.

Full License: https://creativecommons.org/licenses/by-sa/4.0/

MIRIAM "MARRY" VOLLMER

The Artist Who Feels the Past - Complete Character Profile

Created by: João Vitor Perazzolo (pseudonym: Johnny Kestler)
License: CC BY-SA 4.0 (Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International)
Date: 2025

I. BASIC INFORMATION

Full Name: Miriam Esther Vollmer
Nickname: "Marry" (anglicized professional name)
Meaning: Miriam (Hebrew: "bitter," "rebel," "sea of sorrow") - ironically shares name with Ezekiel's wife
Age in Narrative: 32 years old
Year of Birth: 1988
Place of Birth: Portland, Oregon, USA
Ancestry: Ashkenazi Jewish (maternal side) + German (paternal side)
Occupation: Visual artist and freelance illustrator

II. HISTORICAL AND PERSONAL CONTEXT

The Setting: Portland, Oregon, 2020-2021

Why this period?

1. Era of Paradoxical Hyper-Connection: Technology enables global connection, yet epidemic loneliness
2. Spiritual Renaissance: Millennial generation seeking meaning beyond materialism
3. Normalized Mental Health: Therapy and emotional vulnerability culturally accepted
4. Collective Existential Crisis: COVID-19 pandemic forced confrontation with fragility and mortality
5. Archival Rediscovery: Digitization of historical documents makes discoveries possible

Portland: The City of Formation

Characteristics:

Vibrant artistic center, creative community
Culture of accepted introversion ("Keep Portland Weird")
Independent cafés, small galleries, craft markets
Constant rain (perfect metaphor for productive melancholy)
Therapeutically informed community

Importance to Marry:

City that values sensitivity as strength, not weakness
Space where emotional art finds audience
Community of creatives who understand artistic process as therapeutic
But also: echo chamber that can amplify melancholic tendencies

III. FAMILY HISTORY: THE ORIGIN OF SENSITIVITY

The Vollmer Family

David Vollmer (Father, 1955-2019)

Comparative literature professor at Reed College
German-American, third generation
Gentle man, but emotionally distant
Expressed love through books, not words
Died of sudden heart attack when Marry was 31
Last words were unsent email: "Miriam, sorry I never learned to tell you how much I love you. You were always
braver than me."

Sarah Rosenbaum-Vollmer (Mother, 1960-present)

Clinical psychologist, specialized in generational trauma
Ashkenazi Jewish, Holocaust survivor family
Intense woman, overprotective, anxious
Transmitted to Marry: fear of abandonment + need to constantly process emotions
Complex relationship: loves daughter deeply, but projects anxieties onto her
Characteristic phrase: "Miriam, you feel too much. The world will hurt you."

Maternal Grandmother - Esther Rosenbaum (1932-2015)

Auschwitz survivor (deported at age 12)
Never spoke directly about trauma, but Marry "absorbed" it through silence
Taught Marry to paint watercolors (only peaceful moment between them)
Died when Marry was 27
Left her: vintage watercolor kit + diary in Yiddish (never translated)

The Emotional Inheritance

Unresolved Generational Trauma:

Survivor grandmother carried silent pain
Mother absorbed anxiety and hypervigilance
Marry inherited emotional intensity without clear context

Family Pattern:

1. First Generation (Esther): Survival through silence
2. Second Generation (Sarah): Survival through hyperverbalization
3. Third Generation (Marry): Survival through art

Sarah's phrase that haunts Marry: "You take after your grandmother. She also felt everything. That's why she almost
didn't survive."

IV. CHILDHOOD AND YOUTH (1988-2010)

Early Years (0-12 years)

Initial Manifestations of Sensitivity:

Baby who cried when other children cried (bodily empathy)

At 4 years old, had nightmares about "sad people who don't exist"
At 7 years old, began drawing compulsively to "get the feelings out"
Teachers noticed: intelligent, but "emotionally unstable"
First time in child therapy at 9 years old (suspected generalized anxiety)

Family Reaction:

Mother Sarah overprotected while simultaneously validating every emotion
Father David withdrew, uncomfortable with emotional intensity
Marry learned: expressing emotions brings maternal attention but pushes father away
Early internal conflict: "Being myself = being loved AND rejected"

Artistic Childhood:

At 10 years old, received watercolor kit from grandmother Esther
Painting became only activity where she felt "right"
Art teacher (Mrs. Chen) was first adult to say: "Your sensitivity is a gift, Miriam, not a disease."
Marry never forgot that

Adolescence (13-18 years)

Intensification of Difference:

High school was torture: other girls seemed able to "turn off" emotions, she couldn't
First love at 15 (Jacob Stein): she fell completely, he was "just experimenting"
Disproportionate devastation when it ended: 3 months depressed, needed medication
Mother Sarah: "See? I warned you. You need to learn to protect yourself."
Marry internalized: "Feeling deeply is dangerous."

Art as Salvation:

Art portfolio accepted at Rhode Island School of Design (RISD)
But she chose Pacific Northwest College of Art (Portland) to stay close to home
First decision based on fear, not desire
Regret she carries to this day

Initial Spiritual State:

Raised in cultural Judaism (not religious)
Attended Yom Kippur and Passover for family tradition, not faith
At 16, had mystical experience during Kol Nidre (prayer): felt overwhelming presence
Never told anyone (fear of being considered unstable)
Left with unresolved question: "Was that God or my hyperactive imagination?"

V. ARTISTIC FORMATION AND CRISIS (2006-2015)

Pacific Northwest College of Art (2006-2010)

Developing Artistic Style:

Specialization: figurative painting + narrative illustration
Influences: Egon Schiele (emotional intensity), Marc Chagall (Jewish mysticism), Anselm Kiefer (historical
weight)
Professors noted: technically proficient, but "emotionally overwhelming"
Recurring critique: "Your work is powerful, but who would want to live with it?"

Chaotic Relationships:

Series of intense, brief relationships (2-6 months each)
Pattern: immediate connection → total vulnerability → suffocation → rejection
She chose emotionally unavailable men (reproducing dynamic with father)
After each breakup: depression + creative explosion

Graduation Work (2010):

Series of 12 paintings: "Invisible Inheritances"
Imaginary portraits of unknown ancestors carrying symbolic objects
Professors: "Technically masterful. Emotionally disturbing."
Marry: "Then I succeeded."

The Drift Years (2010-2015)

Attempt at Artistic Career:

Moved to Brooklyn (2010-2012) trying to "break into the circuit"
Worked in cafés, galleries, doing portrait commissions
New York amplified her anxiety: too much noise, too much competition, too much performance
Returned to Portland in 2012, feeling "defeated"

Relationship with David (2012-2014):

Graphic designer, 6 years older
First relationship that lasted over 1 year
He was stable, kind, but emotionally limited
Marry tried to "be less intense" to keep him
Result: severe depression (hidden from him) + total creative block
He ended it: "Marry, you're dimmed. I don't know who you are anymore."
Cruel irony: rejected for suppressing what they always rejected in her

Crisis of 2014:

After breakup, 6 months of clinical depression
Stopped painting completely
First serious suicidal ideation
Voluntary hospitalization for 2 weeks
Diagnoses: Major Depression + Borderline Personality Disorder (questionable)

Turning Point:

New therapist (Dr. Kate Morrison, 62 years old, practicing Buddhist):

"Marry, you're not sick. You're using the wrong tools to deal with a sensitivity that is real."

Introduced: art therapy, mindfulness, acceptance of intensity as characteristic, not pathology
Slow reconstruction: 2014-2016

VI. REDISCOVERY AND THE DISCOVERY (2016-2020)

Creative Renaissance (2016-2019)

New Approach:

Freelance illustration as livelihood (less pressure than "fine art")
Personal projects at night: watercolor series about "emotions as landscapes"
Instagram as platform: online community of sensitive artists
Discovered she wasn't alone: thousands feeling deeply

Spiritual Reconnection:

Began attending Shabbat in progressive Jewish community
Young rabbi (Rachel Goldstein, 38): "Miriam, you know that feeling deeply is deeply Jewish? Our prophets felt
too much. That's why God used them."
First time sensitivity was connected to sacred tradition, not pathology

Father's Death (2019):

David died suddenly and silently (as he lived)
Marry discovered unsent email
Complex mourning: loved him, but he never really saw her
Creative process: series "Letters to My Silent Father" (15 watercolors + texts)
Small gallery exhibition: first real artistic validation

The Discovery of the Manuscripts (March 2020)

How It Happened:

Context: COVID-19 pandemic beginning, imminent lockdown
Marry was researching paternal German ancestors (creative mourning project)
Used Ancestry.com, found surname "Kestler" connected to Vollmer (19th century marriage)
Genealogical rabbit hole led to Heidelberg University archive (recently digitized)
Special section: "Documents of Johann Kestler (1864-1912)"

The Moment: Marry opened first PDF file at 2:37 AM, insomniac.

Reading:

"Notebook A - Direct Observations
April 15, 1892
Subject: Man, approx. 45 years old, appears 60+
Height: 1.75m, estimated weight: 55kg (severe malnutrition)
[...]
Observation: subject stopped to help fallen child.
Movement visibly cost him. Created delay in his path. Did it anyway.
Note: behavior inconsistent with expected self-preservation in chronically ill."

Something inside her recognized: "This is important. This will change me."

Obsessive Dive:

Spent entire lockdown (March-June 2020) reading all documents
12 of Johnny's notebooks + Simeon's biography + fragments of Ezekiel's diary
Didn't paint. Didn't eat properly. Just read.
Mother Sarah called worried: "Miriam, are you okay?"
Marry: "Mom... I found a story. Or it found me."

Emotional Impact:

1. Identification with Ezekiel:

Man who felt/perceived too much in world that didn't understand
His oppression = her oppression? (not literal, but metaphorical)
Phrase that broke her: "I no longer pray for relief. I pray for companionship in pain."

2. Fascination with Johnny:

Observer who documented entire life without feeling
Opposite pole: she felt everything, he nothing
Obsessive question: "Was he saved? Did he find what he was looking for?"

3. Personal Resonance:

Sensation that this story specifically needed her
She could feel what Johnny only documented
Ezekiel shared name with her grandmother (Miriam/Miriam)

Complex Jewish-Christian heritage echoed her own

Decision: June 2020, Marry wrote in journal:

"I will paint this story. Not literal illustration. But emotional essence.
I'll go to the Carpathians when pandemic allows.
I'll complete what Johnny started.
I don't know why I know this. But I know."

VII. THE JOURNEY TO THE CARPATHIANS (2021)

Preparation (January-July 2021)

Obsessive Research:

Learned basic Romanian, Cyrillic Russian
Mapped locations mentioned in notebooks
Contacted regional historians (some responded)
Discovered: small community still honors "Saint Ezekiel" (not officially canonized)

Internal Conflict:

Intense fear of traveling alone
But need greater than fear
Mother Sarah: "This is mania, Miriam. You're obsessed."
Therapist Dr. Kate Morrison: "Or... it's purpose."

Meeting Lyber (July 2021): (Note: full development of Lyber comes later, but here's the essential)

Lyber Arnesen, 38 years old, ex-therapist, now writer/researcher
Met in reading group about Christian mysticism in Portland
Marry mentioned manuscripts, Lyber was fascinated
He was planning sabbatical in Eastern Europe (book research)
Proposal: travel together, she paints/feels, he documents/analyzes
Marry hesitated (fear of dependence), but accepted (fear of going alone was greater)

The Trip (August-October 2021)

Itinerary:

1. Heidelberg, Germany (Johnny's traces)
2. Vienna, Austria (Fraternity of Vigilantes archives - partial)
3. Moldova (monastery where Johnny died)
4. Transylvania/Romanian Carpathians (Ezekiel's region)

Crucial Moments:

HEIDELBERG (August):

Visited Heidelberg University
Archive had records of Johann Kestler: perfect grades, no documented social life
Elderly professor showed class photo (1886): Johnny in corner, empty eyes
Marry cried seeing: "He was already dead inside."
Painted watercolor that night: "The Ghost Student"

MONASTERY IN MOLDOVA (September):

Small cemetery, Johnny's simple tombstone:

JOHANN KESTLER
JOHANN KESTLER
1864-1912
1864-1912
"He saw. He recorded. He witnessed."
"He saw. He recorded. He witnessed."

Marry stayed there for 3 hours alone
Spoke aloud: "Johann... did you find what you were looking for? Please tell me you did."
Silence. But different silence - not empty, just... quiet.

ROMANIAN CARPATHIANS (October):

The Central Event:

Found village (now almost abandoned, 80 inhabitants) Orthodox church still standing Local priest (Father Andrei, 70
years old) knew stories of "Ezekiel the Saint" He took them to: graves of Ezekiel + Miriam (wife) + Simeon

At the Cemetery:

Marry read Miriam bat-David's tombstone (1862-1903). Her own name. Same emotional intensity (according to
biographies). Something broke in her.

She knelt, placed hand on earth:

"Miriam... sister across time... did you manage to love despite fear?
Teach me. Please."

Lyber stood in respectful silence at distance.

Then:

Old woman (Ileana, 83 years old) appeared, granddaughter of someone who knew Ezekiel. Spoke Romanian mixed with
Russian. Lyber translated:

"She says Ezekiel prayed for 'shadow that observed him.' Everyone thought it was angel or demon. But he said: 'It's just a
wounded man. God hasn't forgotten him.'"

Marry: "And... and was he saved? The man in the shadow?"

Ileana (through Lyber): "Ezekiel said: 'Grace reaches even shadows. I trust that.'"

Marry collapsed: Cried for first time in months. Not sadness. Relief?

Lyber sat beside her, didn't touch, just present.

After: "Marry... are you okay?"

Marry: "Lyber... I spent my whole life thinking feeling too much was a curse. But Ezekiel felt even the pain of an
invisible observer. And used it to pray. What if... what if my sensitivity isn't a defect? What if it's an antenna picking up
what others don't see? What if it's a gift?"

Silence.

Lyber: "Marry... I think you just understood something I still haven't."

That Night:

Marry painted compulsively in hotel room. Watercolor of Ezekiel kneeling praying. But in shadow behind him: Johnny's
figure observing. And behind Johnny: her own figure, observing both. Three generations of vision. Title: "Invisible
Witnesses"

VIII. RETURN AND TRANSFORMATION (2021-present)

Processing (November 2021-March 2022)

Marry returned to Portland different:

Tangible Changes:

1. Acceptance of intensity as characteristic, not pathology
2. Deeper connection with Jewish heritage (Ezekiel was Jewish-Christian, she secular Jewish)
3. First time seriously considering Christian faith (but with ambivalence)
4. Relationship with mother Sarah: established gentle but firm boundaries

Faith Crisis:

Marry wasn't Christian, but Ezekiel's story confronted her
Began reading New Testament (for first time)
Found: Jesus weeping for Lazarus, Jesus in Gethsemane, Jesus abandoned on cross
Thought: "He also felt too much for the world."
But didn't convert (yet?) - just opened

Relationship with Lyber:

Maintained close contact (deep friendship? Something more? Ambiguous)
Lyber challenged her intellectually, she challenged him emotionally
He analyzes, she feels, together they understand
Dynamic: he analyzes, she feels, together they comprehend

The "Sufficient Grace" Series (2022)

Artistic Project: 24 large watercolors (60x90cm each) + short texts

Structure:

12 paintings: Ezekiel's Life (birth to death)
8 paintings: Johnny observing (including suicide)
4 paintings: Herself processing (meta-layer)

Technique:

Watercolor (grandmother Esther's medium) + gold leaf (reference to Orthodox icons)
Intense but translucent colors (visible but not opaque emotion)
Partially dissolved figures (border between material/spiritual)

Reception:

Exhibition in Portland gallery (May 2022)
Mixed critique:

Some: "Emotionally manipulative"
Others: "Finally art unafraid to feel"

Sold 8 pieces (first financial stability)
San Francisco Jewish museum bought complete series (permanent exhibition)

Personal Impact:

First time sensitivity publicly seen as strength
Strangers shared: "Your art made me feel less alone."
Marry: "So this... this was the purpose? Transforming my pain into bridge?"

IX. CURRENT STATE (2023-present)

Who Is Marry Now

Professionally:

Recognized visual artist (locally)
Freelance illustrator (livelihood)
Occasionally teaches workshops: "Art as Emotional Processing"

Emotionally:

Still intensely sensitive (always will be)
But now with frameworks to process
Accepts that intimate relationships are difficult for her
Works with therapist on "loving without suffocating"

Spiritually:

Stronger Jewish identity (attends Shabbat regularly)
Curiosity about Jesus (reads gospels, but not converted)
Prays? Sometimes. To whom? Not sure.
Current phrase: "Maybe God is big enough to handle my confusion."

Relationally:

Single (conscious current choice)
Deep friendship with Lyber (undefined border)
Relationship with mother Sarah: better, with boundaries
Community: small, but genuine

Unresolved Questions

1. Faith: "Ezekiel was certain about Christ. I only have questions. Is that enough?"
2. Purpose: "I completed the project. And now? What's next?"
3. Relationship with Lyber: "Are we friends? More? Less? I'm afraid to ask."
4. Generational Heritage: "Did I break family pattern or just paint it?"

X. PHYSICAL APPEARANCE AND MANNERISMS

Appearance (32 years, 2023)

Structure:

Height: 1.65m
Build: thin but not fragile
Skin: pale (Ashkenazi ancestry + little Portland sun)
Hair: dark brown, wavy, usually in messy bun
Eyes: brown-greenish, intense, always observing

Distinctive Features:

Hands always stained with paint/graphite
Short nails (bites when anxious)
Posture: slightly hunched (unconscious protection)
Wears glasses for work (mild myopia)
Light freckles on nose (only visible up close)

Style:

Clothes: practical, artistic, vintage
Colors: earth tones, occasionally intense red
Always wears: thin gold necklace (grandmother Esther's inheritance)
Carries: A5 sketchbook, always

Mannerisms

Physical:

Twists hair when thinking
Bites lower lip when emotional
Gesticulates much when speaking (expressive hands)
Cries easily (no longer ashamed)
Laughs with whole body (rare, but genuine)

Vocal:

Voice: medium, soft, but can become passionate quickly
Speaks fast when excited
Long silences when processing
Uses Yiddish words occasionally (from grandmother)

Social:

Intense eye contact (uncomfortable for some)
Touches people when speaking (arm, shoulder - physical connection)
Needs alone time after social interactions
Writes/draws in notebook during conversations (processes this way)

XI. DEEP PSYCHOLOGY

Jungian Archetypes

Primary: The Wounded Artist
Secondary: The Prophetess (captures the invisible)
Shadow: The Victim (excessive identification with suffering)

Defense Mechanisms

1. Artistic Sublimation (healthy): Transforms pain into creation
2. Idealization (problematic): Sees others as capable of completing her
3. Dramatization (moderate): Intensifies expression to ensure being seen
4. Regression (occasional): Returns to childlike states under stress

Core Wounds

1. Emotional Abandonment: Father present physically, absent emotionally

2. Generational Transmission: Inherited unprocessed trauma
3. Invalidation: Sensitivity treated as pathology, not gift
4. Invisibility: Fear of not being truly seen/known

Deep Needs

1. To be seen in totality (not just acceptable parts)
2. Confirm that sensitivity has purpose
3. Authentic connection that doesn't require self-suppression
4. Transcendent meaning for personal pain

XII. NARRATIVE FUNCTION

Why Marry Exists in the Larger Story

Function 1 - Emotional Completeness: Johnny documented without feeling. Marry feels what he documented. Story
needs both to be complete.

Function 2 - Generational Bridge: Ezekiel (1847-1905) → Johnny (1864-1912) → Marry (1988-present) Grace
crossing generations, healing what was broken.

Function 3 - Modern Witness: Contemporary reader needs entry point. Marry is door: sensitive, questioning, not
perfectly resolved.

Function 4 - Redemption of Sensitivity: Story proves that feeling deeply isn't curse, but antenna for the sacred.

XIII. DEVELOPMENT ARCS

External Arc (2020-2023)

Discovery → Research → Travel → Creation → Recognition

Internal Arc (ongoing)

Shame of sensitivity → Acceptance → Valuation → Doubt: "And now?" → [unresolved]

Spiritual Arc (open)

Cultural Judaism → Ignored mystical experience → Confrontation with Christ through Ezekiel → [ambiguous]

Final Unanswered Question: "Ezekiel had faith. Johnny sought faith. I have... what? Do honest questions count?"

XIV. CHARACTERISTIC QUOTES

About Sensitivity

"I spent my life being 'too much.' Too much emotion, too much intensity, too much need. What if I was never too much?
What if the world was too little?"

About Art

"I don't paint what I see. I paint what I feel when I see. The difference is everything."

About Ezekiel

"He carried oppression for 48 years and still chose love. I have no excuse for my bitterness."

About Johnny

"Johann Kestler spent 13 years observing a saint and died without knowing if he was saved. I read about them and cry
for both. Maybe that's my role - feeling what they couldn't."

About Faith

"I don't know if I believe in God. But after reading about Ezekiel... I can't not believe anymore. I'm stuck between
certainty and doubt. It's a horrible and sacred place."

About Purpose

"My grandmother survived Auschwitz but never processed. My mother processed but never created. I create. Maybe
that's healing - three generations to transform trauma into beauty."

About Relationships

"I love deeply and quickly. It scares people. Before I tried to be less. Now? Now I just warn: 'I'm intensity. If you can't
handle it, that's okay. But don't ask me to be small.'"

About the Carpathian Journey

"I went to Europe looking for two dead men. Found something bigger: proof that my sensitivity isn't a curse. It's
inheritance. It's calling. It's gift."

XV. KEY RELATIONSHIPS

With Lyber Arnesen (Complex)

Nature: Deep friendship with ambiguous attraction

Dynamic:

He is rational consciousness, she is intense feeling
He challenges her intellectually, she challenges him emotionally
Traveled together to Carpathians (forged intimacy)
He's writing book about Ezekiel, she painted series
Creative collaboration that might be more

Tension:

Marry fears ruining friendship with romantic expectations
Lyber fears not being able to give emotional intensity she needs
Both avoid direct conversation (for different reasons)

Defining Moment: At Ezekiel's grave, Marry collapsed crying. Lyber didn't try to fix, just stayed present. She thought:
"He's the first who doesn't try to save or silence me." He thought: "She feels what I only analyze. I need her."

Current State: Undefined, but deep

With Sarah Rosenbaum-Vollmer (Mother) - In Healing

Historical Pattern:

Sarah overprotected from fear (based on generational trauma)
Marry internalized: "I'm too fragile for world"
Cycle: Marry gets hurt → Sarah says "I told you" → Marry feels worse

Turning Point (2021): Before Europe trip, crucial conversation:

Sarah: "Miriam, you're going to hurt yourself chasing ghosts." Marry: "Mom, I'm already hurt. Always have been. You
too. Grandma too. But she survived Auschwitz. I think I can survive a trip to Romania." Sarah (crying): "I just want to
protect you." Marry (gentle but firm): "I know. But you can't. No one can. I need to learn to protect myself. And
sometimes that means risking myself."

Current State:

Weekly phone conversations (used to be daily)
Sarah in therapy working on her own anxiety
Marry established loving boundaries
Healthier relationship, less enmeshed

With Dr. Kate Morrison (Therapist) - Mentor

Duration: 2014-present (9 years)

Impact:

Only person who validated Marry's sensitivity from beginning
Taught: mindfulness, self-compassion, art therapy
Practicing Buddhist (which broadened Marry's perspective)

Crucial Moment (2015): Marry, after suicide attempt: "Dr. Morrison, I don't want to feel like this anymore." Dr.
Morrison: "Feel like what?" Marry: "Everything. So deeply. It hurts too much." Dr. Morrison: "Marry... do you want to
stop feeling deeply, or do you want to stop suffering from feeling deeply?" Marry: "...I don't know the difference." Dr.
Morrison: "The difference is everything. One requires anesthesia. The other requires acceptance."

Current State:

Monthly sessions (used to be weekly)
Dr. Morrison encouraged Ezekiel/Johnny project
Celebrated exhibition as healing milestone

With Ezekiel ben-Avraham (Across Time)

Nature: Trans-temporal spiritual connection

How It Started: Reading Johnny's notebooks, Marry "met" Ezekiel. Something in her recognized something in him:
suffering as portal, not prison.

Connection Moments:

1. Reading about Ezekiel helping beggar despite exhaustion: Marry: "I would do the same. And would hurt myself

doing it."

2. Reading phrase: "I no longer pray for relief. I pray for companionship in pain." Marry cried for 20 minutes.

Painted watercolor: "Redesigned Prayer."
3. At his grave: spoke aloud as if he could hear

What Ezekiel Taught Marry:

Suffering doesn't need to be wasted
Feeling deeply can be vocation
Grace doesn't eliminate pain, but redeems purpose
It's possible to choose love even when it costs everything

Marry's phrase: "Ezekiel is saint I never met and closest friend I have."

With Johann "Johnny" Kestler (Across Time)

Nature: Inverted identificatory fascination

Why Johnny Obsesses Her:

He didn't feel, she feels too much
He observed without connection, she connects without filter
He documented Ezekiel objectively, she paints him emotionally
They are opposites who complete record of same story

Marry's Central Question: "Was Johnny saved?"

She can't let it go because:

If he was saved despite emptiness, there's hope for everyone
If he wasn't, tragedy is too complete to bear
She needs to believe 13 years observing Ezekiel meant something

Crucial Moment: At Johnny's grave (Moldova), Marry placed hand on tombstone:

"Johann... you said in 1890: 'I'm broken instrument that functions perfectly.'
I say in 2021: 'I'm instrument that functions broken.'
We're inverses.
Did you find what you were looking for?
Please... tell me you found it."

What Johnny Taught Marry:

Transformation possible even for the most "dead"
Observing faithfully is form of love (even without feeling)
Documenting truth has eternal value
Unresolved questions are also legacy

With Miriam bat-David (Ezekiel's Wife) - Mystical Connection

Why It Matters:

Share name (Miriam/Marry)
Both intensely sensitive
Both loved men marked by suffering
Miriam died in 1903 (40 years), Marry is 32 in 2020

Discovery: When Marry saw Miriam bat-David's grave in Carpathians, something broke. Brief biography: "Devoted
wife, patient with his suffering, creative."

Marry thought: "She managed. Loved someone profoundly marked and didn't lose herself. How? Teach me."

Synchronicity: Father Andrei mentioned Miriam painted watercolors. Marry paints watercolors (grandmother Esther's
inheritance). Three Miriams connected through art and sensitivity.

Resulting Painting: "Three Miriams" - watercolor of three women (Miriam bat-David 1903, Esther Rosenbaum 1945,
Marry Vollmer 2021) in timeless garden, all painting.

XVI. SPIRITUAL DEVELOPMENT

Phase 1: Cultural Judaism (1988-2016)

Characteristics:

Attended Yom Kippur, Passover (family tradition)
No deep spiritual connection
Jewish identity = cultural heritage, not active faith
Mystical Experience (16 years): During Kol Nidre, felt overwhelming presence. Never told anyone (fear of
judgment). Kept as "maybe imagination, maybe God."

Phase 2: Confused Seeking (2016-2020)

Catalysts:

Father's death (2019)
Therapy with Dr. Kate Morrison (Buddhist)
Reconnection with Shabbat

Emerging Questions: "If there's God, why generational heritage of trauma?" "If there's God, why does sensitivity hurt
me so much?" "Is faith feeling or choice?"

Phase 3: Confrontation with Christ (2020-present)

Through Ezekiel: Reading manuscripts, Marry was confronted with Jesus indirectly. Ezekiel was converted Jew who
found in Christ answer for oppression.

Reading the Gospels (2020-2021): Marry read New Testament for first time, focusing on:

1. Jesus weeping for Lazarus (John 11): "He felt. Incarnate God felt so deeply he wept publicly."
2. Jesus in Gethsemane (Matthew 26): "Mortal sadness. He knew emotional intensity that crushes."
3. Jesus on Cross (Mark 15): "'My God, why have you forsaken me?' He knew worst oppression: separation from

Father."

Impact: For first time, Marry saw God who not only understands suffering, but experienced it.

Current State: "Stuck Between"

Not Converted, But Not Indifferent:

Marry is in liminal place:

Strong Jewish identity (grandmother Esther, cultural heritage)
Fascination with Jesus (through Ezekiel)
Unable to deny or affirm

Characteristic Phrase: "I can't become Christian without betraying grandma Esther. But I can't ignore that Jesus
understands my sensitivity better than any rabbi I've met. I'm stuck. It's terrible. And maybe it's exactly where I need to
be."

Current Prayer (when she prays): "God of Abraham, Isaac, Jacob... and maybe Jesus... I don't know what to call you.
Don't know if I believe right. Just know I need you. If you exist, this has to be enough for now."

Silence. But different silence. Not empty. Just... quiet. Not answer. But not rejection.

Central Theological Question

Does Grace Reach Ambivalence?

Ezekiel had certainty. Johnny had doubt that became seeking. Marry has... honest confusion.

She constantly asks: "Do I need perfect faith or is imperfect honesty enough?"

Lyber (in conversation, 2022): "Marry, you know what Ezekiel said? 'Grace was sufficient.' Not 'my faith was sufficient.'
Grace. Maybe grace reaches even those without certainty."

Marry: "Lyber... I hope you're right. Because certainty won't happen to me anytime soon."

XVII. ARTISTIC WORK: "SUFFICIENT GRACE" SERIES

Structure of 24 Watercolors

PART I: THE MARKED ONE (12 paintings)

1. "Birth Under Shadows" - Baby Ezekiel, subtle demonic shadows in background
2. "Solitary Childhood" - Isolated child, other children in distance
3. "First Vision" - Young Ezekiel seeing beyond veil (terrified eyes)
4. "Conversion" - Light penetrating darkness, kneeling figure
5. "Learning to Fight" - Ezekiel with Father Antonio, invisible spiritual swords
6. "Paradoxical Ministry" - Freeing others while oppressed
7. "The Wedding" - Ezekiel and Miriam, fragile but real joy
8. "Miriam's Death" - Female figure dissolving into light, Ezekiel collapsing
9. "The Breaking Night (1895)" - Spiritual confrontation, invisible violence
10. "Positional Freedom" - Broken chains, but body still marked
11. "Final Years" - Ezekiel teaching youth, tired but at peace
12. "Grace Was Sufficient" - Ezekiel's death, light ascending

PART II: THE SHADOW (8 paintings)

13. "The Ghost Student" - Young Johnny in Heidelberg, translucent
14. "First Observation" - Johnny hidden, Ezekiel helping child
15. "Thirteen Invisible Years" - Montage of Johnny in multiple disguises
16. "The Only Real Encounter" - Johnny and Ezekiel, April 10 1905, eyes meeting
17. "Final Vigil" - Johnny outside window, Ezekiel dying inside
18. "The Compilation" - Johnny surrounded by notebooks, prematurely aged
19. "The Grave" - Johnny at Ezekiel's tomb, crying for first time
20. "Last Letter" - Johnny's hand writing, poison beside

PART III: THE WITNESS (4 paintings)

21. "Discovery" - Marry at 32, reading notebooks by laptop light (2020)
22. "Pilgrimage" - Marry kneeling at Carpathian graves
23. "Three Miriams" - Miriam bat-David, Esther, Marry in timeless garden
24. "Invisible Witnesses" - Ezekiel praying (front), Johnny observing (middle), Marry painting (back) - three layers of

witness

Technique and Symbolism

Medium: Watercolor + gold leaf

Why watercolor?

Grandmother Esther's inheritance
Translucent (emotions visible but not opaque)
Permanently vulnerable (can't be "corrected" like oil)
Water = tears, baptism, purification

Why gold leaf?

Reference to Orthodox icons (Ezekiel was Orthodox)
Sacred penetrating mundane
Beauty born from suffering
Light not dependent on external source

Color Palette:

Deep blues (sacred melancholy)
Intense reds (suffering, blood, love)
Golds (grace, divine presence)
Translucent grays (Johnny, Marry in doubt)

Critical Reception

Positive:

Portland Monthly: "Vollmer creates visual theology that doesn't preach, but witnesses."
Rabbi Rachel Goldstein: "Art that honors Jewish suffering without exploitation."
Critic in Art Forum: "Finally someone treating faith with emotional complexity."

Negative:

The Stranger: "Emotionally manipulative, spiritually pretentious."
Secular critic: "Technically beautiful, but who wants to live with such weight?"

Marry's Response: "I didn't make it to be comfortable. I made it to be true."

XVIII. CHALLENGES AND LIMITATIONS

Unintegrated Psychological Shadow

Aspects Marry Still Denies:

1. Righteous Anger:

Has right to be furious at absent father, but represses
Sees anger as "ugly," incompatible with sensitivity
Needs to learn: anger protects, doesn't just destroy

2. Healthy Selfishness:

Gives excessively expecting reciprocity
When doesn't receive, resents but doesn't set boundaries
Needs to learn: self-care isn't betrayal

3. Envy:

Envies emotionally stable people
Judges herself for envying (double layer of shame)
Needs to learn: envy reveals legitimate desire

4. Emotional Manipulation:

Sometimes uses vulnerability strategically
Not consciously malicious, but effective
Needs to recognize: not all intensity is pure

Persistent Destructive Patterns

1. Boundary Testing in Relationships:

Reveals difficult aspects early to "see if still loved"
Self-sabotage disguised as authenticity
Lyber is first person who hasn't fled (yet)

2. Excessive Identification with Suffering:

Risk of making suffering her identity
"If I don't suffer intensely, who am I?"
Needs to learn joy without guilt

3. Romanticization of Pain:

Sees beauty in suffering (true)
But sometimes seeks suffering to create beauty (problematic)
Thin line between witnessing pain and cultivating it

Practical Challenges

Financial:

Art doesn't pay bills consistently
Freelance illustration = unstable income
Anxiety about money amplifies other anxieties

Relational:

Difficulty maintaining casual friendships
"All or nothing" - deep intimacy or nothing
Chronic loneliness despite being loved by some

Spiritual:

Stuck between Judaism and fascination with Jesus
Doesn't fully belong to either
Liminality is painful

XIX. GROWTH POTENTIALS

What Marry Still Needs to Learn

1. Advanced Emotional Self-Regulation:

Not suppress, but modulate intensity when appropriate
Feeling deeply ≠ expressing everything always

2. Joy Without Guilt:

Permission to be happy without feeling she betrays those who suffer
Ezekiel found joy with Miriam - she can too

3. Loving Boundaries:

Say no without excessive guilt
Care for self as she cares for others

4. Faith or Peace with Doubt:

Either develops clear faith, or accepts honest ambivalence is also valid
Stop punishing herself for not having certainty

5. Sustainable Intimacy:

Deep relationship that doesn't require total fusion
Love Lyber (or another) without losing herself in him

Possible Next Narrative Steps

Option 1: Deepening with Lyber

Honest conversation about feelings
Discover they can be intimate without her suffocating or him withdrawing
Relationship becomes model of integration (emotion + consciousness)

Option 2: Additional Discovery

Finds more documents from Johnny or Ezekiel
Something that transforms understanding of story
New artistic series: "Sufficient Grace II"

Option 3: Faith Crisis

Direct confrontation with Jesus question
Either converts, definitively rejects, or accepts permanent liminality

Option 4: Motherhood?

Unexplored question: Marry with children?
Fear of replicating generational patterns vs. desire to nurture

XX. CONCLUSION: WHO IS MARRY VOLLMER?

Marry Vollmer is 32-year-old woman who feels the world in high definition.

She is:

Artist who transforms personal and others' pain into visual beauty
Heir of generational trauma seeking to break patterns
Witness of stories that need to be felt, not just documented
Spiritual seeker stuck between traditions
Intense lover who hasn't yet found who can handle her totality
Daughter learning to love mother while maintaining own identity

Her greatest strength: Capacity to feel deeply what others anesthetize

Her greatest challenge: Learning that feeling everything doesn't require carrying everything

Her current journey: Transforming sensitivity from wound into portal

XXI. OPEN QUESTIONS (For Future Development)

1. Do Marry and Lyber become couple? Or is deep friendship enough?
2. Does Marry convert to Christianity? Remain Jewish? Find hybrid path?
3. Does she have children? How does she deal with fear of generational transmission?
4. Next artistic project? After "Sufficient Grace," what to create?
5. Was Johnny saved? Will Marry ever have satisfactory answer?
6. Relationship with mother Sarah? Complete healing or acceptance of limitations?
7. Long-term purpose? Does art continue being enough or seek something more?

XXII. FINAL NOTE: MARRY AS REAL PERSON

It's easy to turn her into archetype and forget the woman.

Miriam "Marry" Vollmer:

Loves coffee with cardamom (learns from rabbi Rachel)
Cries at dog commercials
Laughs uncontrollably at silly memes
Has Spotify playlist called "Cry Beautifully" (Sufjan Stevens, Bon Iver)
Talks to herself constantly (processes this way)
Wears pajamas 80% of time at home
Collects vintage cups (each has story)
Doesn't know how to drive (too much anxiety)
Loves cooking but forgets to eat
Sleeps poorly (mind doesn't shut off)
Dreams vividly and notes upon waking

She is flawed, intense, questioning, contradictory, real.

And exactly because of that, her journey matters.

Because if Marry - woman who feels too much in world that values anesthesia - can transform sensitivity into gift...

Then there's hope for all who've been called "too much."

END OF MIRIAM "MARRY" VOLLMER PROFILE

"Don't ask me to be less. Ask the world to be more."
— Marry Vollmer, personal journal, 2022

Created by: João Vitor Perazzolo (pseudonym: Johnny Kestler)
License: CC BY-SA 4.0 (Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International)
Date: 2025

LYBER HENRIK ARNESEN

The Man Who Built a Prison of Consciousness

Complete Character Profile

Author: João Vitor Perazzolo

Pen Name: Johnny Kestler

Date: 2025

License: Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International (CC BY-SA 4.0)

TABLE OF CONTENTS

1. Basic Information

2. The Foundational Wound

3. Family Dynamics

4. Education and Formation

5. Career as Therapist

6. The Inner Journey

7. Meeting Marry and the Manuscripts

8. The Journey to the Carpathians

9. After the Journey

10. Relationship with Marry

11. Deep Psychology

12. Spiritual Development

13. The Book Project

14. Physical Appearance and Mannerisms

15. Strengths and Flaws

16. Character Arc

17. Characteristic Quotes

I. BASIC INFORMATION

Full Name: Lyber Henrik Arnesen

Meaning: Lyber (variation of "free" in Old Norwegian) - an irony he only realizes at 38 years old

Age: 38-40 years old (born in 1983)

Geographic Trajectory:

Seattle, Washington (1983-2019)

Portland, Oregon (2019-present)

Ancestry: Norwegian-American (second generation)

Occupations:

Former therapist specializing in complex trauma (2008-2018)

Independent writer/researcher (2018-present)

Occasional workshop facilitator on masculinity and vulnerability (2020-present)

II. THE FOUNDATIONAL WOUND

The Event That Was Never Processed (Age: 12, 1995)

The Night:

Lyber, 12 years old, returning from school. Entered home early (soccer practice cancelled). Found mother Ingrid

in the bathroom, unconscious, empty pill bottle beside her.

What happened in the next 8 minutes defined the next 26 years of his life:

Minute 1-2: Pure panic. Screamed for father (wasn't there). Screamed for mother (no response).

Minute 3: Something changed. Panic was... turned off. As if his brain decided: "We don't have time to feel. Just

act."

Minute 4-6: Called 911. Calm voice, descriptive, precise. Operator would later say: "He sounded like an adult.

Not like a 12-year-old child."

Minute 7-8: Followed instructions. Turned mother on her side. Checked breathing. Waited for ambulance.

When paramedics arrived: They praised him. "You saved your mother, kid. You acted perfectly."

Lyber didn't cry. Just nodded.

What Was Born That Night

Foundational Belief That Formed His Entire Life:

"If I can understand everything, if I can be conscious enough, if I can analyze before feeling, if I can predict

all scenarios... I can control chaos. I can prevent tragedies. I can save people."

The Problem: This belief saved him at 12. But imprisoned him for the next 26 years.

III. FAMILY DYNAMICS

Henrik Arnesen (Father, 1952-2016)

Norwegian-American civil engineer

Extremely logical, functional, emotionally constipated

After wife's suicide attempt, became even more absent

Not out of cruelty, but complete inability to deal with emotions

Died of pancreatic cancer in 2016 without ever having a real conversation with his son

Crucial (and final) dialogue between Lyber and Henrik, 2016, hospital:

Henrik (weak voice): "Lyber... take care of your mother."

Lyber (38 years old, decades of therapy, theoretically "resolved"): "Dad... you can't ask me that now. I've

taken care of her my whole life. You never—"

Henrik: "I know. I'm sorry. I... never knew how. You always knew."

Lyber: "No, Dad. I never knew. I just had to learn because you weren't there."

Henrik (last thing he said before losing consciousness): "You turned out fine. You always turn out fine."

And that phrase haunts Lyber to this day. Because it's a lie. He never turned out fine. He just became functional.

Ingrid Arnesen (Mother, 1955-present)

High school literature teacher

Warm, creative, deeply depressed woman

Chronic depression inadequately treated (80s-90s, stigma was greater)

After suicide attempt, improved with medication, but guilt remained

Transformed 12-year-old son into family's "emotional therapist"

Pattern that developed (1995-2001):

Every time Ingrid had a "bad day":

Lyber cancelled plans

Sat with her

Listened for hours

"Processed" her emotions

Made sure she was "okay" before sleeping

She would say: "Thank you, Lyber. You understand me like no one else."

And he felt: pride (I'm useful) + resentment (I don't want to do this) + guilt (how can I resent helping my

mother?).

Consequence: By age 16, Lyber was more his mother's "therapist" than her son. And the only way he found to

survive emotionally was... to intellectualize everything.

"If I understand psychologically why she is this way, I don't need to feel anger."

"If I analyze dysfunctional family structures, I don't need to admit I'm in one."

"If I'm conscious, I'm in control."

IV. EDUCATION AND FORMATION

Undergraduate: University of Washington, Psychology (2001-2005)

Why did he choose Psychology?

Superficial answer (that he gave): "I've always been fascinated by the human mind."

Real answer (that took years of therapy to admit): "If I can scientifically understand why my mother

wanted to die, maybe I can guarantee it never happens again. And maybe I can understand why I can't

simply... feel things like normal people."

Defining Events of Undergraduate:

1. First Serious Relationship - Sarah Chen (2003-2004)

Sarah was everything he wasn't:

Spontaneous

Emotionally expressive

Lived in the moment

Didn't analyze everything to death

She fell in love with his "depth." He fell in love with her lightness.

Lasted 11 months. Ended like this:

Sarah (crying): "Lyber, I love you. But loving you is like loving a book. You're fascinating, deep, beautiful...

but I can't really touch you. You're always observing, always analyzing. Even when we have sex, I feel like

you're mentally taking notes."

Lyber (calm, controlled): "That's not fair, Sarah. I'm present."

Sarah: "You're conscious. It's not the same thing."

She left. He didn't cry. Wrote down the entire conversation in his journal. Analyzed where he "went wrong."

Didn't process that he had just lost someone he loved.

2. Phenomenology Course with Professor Dr. Marcus Wei (2004)

Course on philosophy of lived experience. Heidegger, Merleau-Ponty, Husserl.

Phrase Professor Wei said that hit Lyber like a shot:

"Excessive consciousness can be a form of avoidance. Observing yourself living is not the same as living."

Lyber wrote in his journal (2004):

"Wei is wrong. Consciousness is a tool of liberation, not prison. If I don't observe, how will I improve? How

will I be sure I'm not out of control?"

It would take 14 years to realize Wei was right.

Master's: Clinical Psychology, Specialization in CBT (2005-2008)

Why CBT (Cognitive-Behavioral Therapy)?

Because it's the most "rational" approach to therapy:

Evidence-based

Structured

Focus on thought patterns, not visceral feelings

Less "messy" than psychoanalysis or experiential therapies

Perfect for someone who prefers thinking about emotions to feeling them

Mandatory Personal Analysis: 4 Years with Dr. Helen Matsuda (2004-2008)

Analyst: Dr. Helen Matsuda, Jungian, 58 years old, Japanese-American, silent but relentless.

Crucial Session (2006, third year of analysis):

Helen (after long silence): "Lyber, are you using analysis as a tool or as a shield?"

Lyber: "I don't understand the question."

Helen: "You understand everything intellectually. Family structures, attachment patterns, psychological

defenses. You can explain your dynamic with your mother better than I can. But you never... feel. You never

cry here. You never get genuinely furious. You observe your emotions. You don't inhabit them."

Lyber (defensive): "Because observing is how I process. It's how I—"

Helen: "Control?"

Silence.

Helen: "Lyber, what happens if you lose control?"

Lyber (first time his voice trembled in session): "I... can't."

Helen: "Why?"

Lyber: "Because if I lose control... someone might die."

And then he left. First and only time.

The Crucial Insight (that he had, but didn't fully integrate):

"I'm using consciousness not to free myself, but to protect myself. Not to live fully, but to avoid catastrophe.

I understand my emotions theoretically, but don't feel them viscerally. And I'm so accustomed to this subtle

dissociation that I don't even notice I'm dissociated."

But insight without integration is just... more intellectual knowledge.

V. CAREER AS THERAPIST (2008-2018): THE DECADE OF PARADOX

Specialization: Complex Trauma, Existential Anxiety, Men with Alexithymia

Why was he exceptionally good:

1. Supernatural Analytical Capacity: Saw patterns other therapists missed. Connected dots between current

symptoms and old traumas with surgical precision.

2. Calm and Non-Reactive Presence: Clients in total crisis would calm down in his room. His emotional

regulation (hyper-control) created a sense of safety.

3. Questions No One Else Asked:

"You're not asking if you're depressed. You're asking if you have permission to be depressed."

"What do you gain by maintaining this pattern?"

"When was the last time you felt something without immediately trying to fix it?"

4. Ability to Sit with Discomfort: Didn't rush clients. Tolerated long silences. Had no neurotic need to

"solve" everything in 50 minutes.

Cases That Defined Him (and Wore Him Down)

1. Marcus Thompson (2010-2014, 4 years of therapy)

Iraq veteran, 32 years old, severe PTSD. Suicide attempt that led him to mandatory therapy.

Marcus didn't speak. First 6 sessions: complete silence.

Lyber didn't force. Just sat with him.

Session 7, Marcus spoke: "Why don't you give up on me?"

Lyber: "Why would I give up?"

Marcus: "Everyone gives up."

Lyber: "I'm not everyone. And you're not a project to be given up on. You're a person. I stay."

Took 2 years, but Marcus rebuilt his life. Got married. Had a child. Sent Christmas cards every year to Lyber.

The Cost: Lyber absorbed Marcus's war trauma viscerally. Had nightmares about combat he never experienced.

First time he realized: "I'm carrying pain that isn't mine."

2. David Kenji Chen (2015-2018, therapy until the end)

45-year-old man, severe alexithymia (inability to identify/express emotions). Engineer, successful, married, two

children. Wife dragged him to therapy: "He doesn't feel anything. It's like being married to a robot."

Lyber saw in David a disturbing reflection of himself.

They worked for 3 years. David improved marginally. Learned emotional vocabulary. Could say "I feel

frustrated" instead of just "I don't know."

But never really... felt. Just performed feeling more convincingly.

Last session (March 2018):

David: "Lyber, thank you. You helped me a lot."

Lyber: "David... can I be honest?"

David: "Of course."

Lyber: "I failed you. Because I gave you tools to talk about emotions. But I couldn't teach you to feel them.

And I think... I think it's because I don't know how myself."

David (first time Lyber saw him genuinely surprised): "You? But you're a therapist."

Lyber: "Exactly."

3. The Case That Broke Everything: Elise Morgan (2017-2018)

28-year-old woman, severe borderline, history of self-harm.

Lyber worked with her for 14 months. She was improving. Decreased self-destructive behaviors. Started

regulating emotions.

And then, May 2018, she killed herself.

Left a letter. Not to family. To Lyber:

"Dr. Arnesen, thank you for trying. You taught me to understand why I was suffering. But understanding

didn't stop the pain. Maybe some people can't be saved. It wasn't your fault. You did everything right. But

'right' wasn't enough. - Elise"

The Collapse (June 2018, 35 years old)

After Elise's death:

Lyber continued seeing clients. Professional. Competent. Present.

But something broke internally.

3 months later (September 2018), in session with a client:

Client crying: "I don't know if I can go on..."

And Lyber, for the first time in 10 years of practice... froze.

Blank mind. No words. No strategies. No insightful questions.

Just emptiness.

Ended session early. Cancelled rest of day. Drove home.

Sat on living room floor. And for the first time since age 12...

Couldn't analyze what he was feeling. Couldn't intellectualize. Couldn't control.

Just felt.

And it was unbearable.

The Decision to Stop (October 2018)

Lyber didn't have a "dramatic revelation moment." Had cold and logical recognition:

"I spent 10 years helping people live authentically. But I don't live authentically. I live consciously. And I

realized: it's not the same thing. I can't guide people to a place I've never been myself. It's not ethical. And

it's killing me."

Closed practice. Returned clients to colleagues (careful process, took 3 months).

Took decade's savings. Decided:

"I'm going to write the book I've always postponed. And maybe... maybe learn to live instead of observing

life."

VI. THE INNER JOURNEY (2018-2020)

The Book He Started to Write (and Couldn't)

Provisional Title: "Beyond Consciousness: When Awareness Becomes Prison"

Wrote 340 pages in 8 months.

And then read. And realized:

It was intellectually impeccable. Well argued. Full of references.

And completely dead.

Had no life. Just analysis of life.

Deleted everything (June 2019).

The Move to Portland (August 2019)

Why Portland?

Rational answer: "Lower cost of living than Seattle. Vibrant artistic community. Good for a writer."

Real answer: "I need to go somewhere where no one knows me. Where I'm not 'Lyber the therapist.' Where

I can fall apart without an audience."

The Year of Drift (2019-2020)

Lyber in Portland:

Didn't write

Worked part-time in a bookstore

Did therapy 2x per week (new therapist, Dr. Chen)

Walked. A lot. Alone.

Tried meditation (hated it - "too much time alone with mind")

Tried yoga (better, but still resistance)

What was happening: Slow deconstruction of identity built on control.

Dialogue with Dr. Chen (February 2020):

Dr. Chen: "Lyber, what do you want from therapy?"

Lyber: "I don't know. Before I wanted to understand. Now... I think I understand too much."

Dr. Chen: "So what do you want?"

Lyber (long silence): "I want... to stop observing my life and start living it. But I don't know how."

Dr. Chen: "First step: accept that you don't need to know how. Just begin."

VII. MEETING MARRY AND THE MANUSCRIPTS (July 2020)

How They Met: Reading Group on Christian Mysticism

Location: Independent bookstore in Portland, "Powell's Books," theology section.

Book of the month: "The Cloud of Unknowing" (medieval mystical text)

Small group: 8 people, mostly 40-60 years old, Lyber (36) and Marry (32) were the youngest.

Moment Lyber noticed Marry:

Discussion about "knowing God beyond intellect."

Marry spoke (emotional, almost crying):

"I've spent my whole life trying to understand. Reading theology, philosophy, psychology. But this author

says that true knowledge of God is... unknowing. Abandonment of understanding. And that... that terrifies

and frees me at the same time."

Lyber looked at her and thought:

"She feels what I only think."

Conversation after group (first time they spoke):

Lyber: "I liked what you said. About unknowing."

Marry: "Thanks. Are you new to the group?"

Lyber: "First day. You?"

Marry: "A few months. Are you Christian?"

Lyber (honest): "I don't know. I was raised culturally Lutheran, but... functional agnostic? And you?"

Marry: "Jewish. But fascinated by Jesus. It's complicated."

Lyber: "Complicated is my favorite word."

She laughed. And something in Lyber... relaxed.

The Revelation of the Manuscripts (Third Meeting, August 2020)

Conversation in café after reading group:

Marry (hesitant): "Can I tell you something strange?"

Lyber: "The stranger, the better."

Marry: "I found manuscripts. Historical documents about a Jewish man converted in the 19th century who

was... demonically oppressed. For decades. And another man - German, scientist - who observed him in

secret for 13 years and documented everything. It's... it's real. I verified. And I can't stop thinking about it."

Lyber (something in him ignites): "Can I read it?"

Lyber Reads the Manuscripts (August-September 2020, 3 weeks)

Marry lent digital copies.

Lyber read compulsively:

Johnny's notebooks

Fragments of Ezequiel's diary

Simeon's biography

What impacted him:

About Ezequiel:

Man who suffered for 48 years under oppression

Never gave up

Chose love repeatedly despite cost

Had faith Lyber didn't have, but vulnerability Lyber recognized

About Johnny:

Observer who documented life without feeling

Built entire identity on dissociation

Died without being able to integrate feeling and thought

Last letter showing regret

And Lyber saw: reflection of himself.

Ezequiel felt too much and was oppressed by it.

Johnny didn't feel and was empty because of it.

Lyber... was in the middle. Felt, but controlled so much he barely felt.

Email he sent to Marry (September 2020):

"Marry,

I finished reading. Can't stop thinking. Ezequiel and Johnny are opposites: one feels everything, the other

nothing. But both suffered immensely. And I keep thinking: is there a healthy middle ground? Or is balance

an illusion?

You mentioned you're going to Europe to research more. Can I go with you? I don't know exactly why.

Maybe because I'm writing a book (trying) about consciousness and suffering, and this story confronts

everything I think I know.

Or maybe because you feel what I analyze, and together maybe we'll see what they couldn't see alone.

What do you think?

Lyber"

VIII. THE JOURNEY TO THE CARPATHIANS (August-October 2021)

Why Lyber Really Went

Reason he said: "Research for book."

Partial reason: "Marry shouldn't go alone."

Real reason (that took months to admit):

"I'm 37 years old. I've spent my whole life trying to be conscious, present, integrated. And I failed. Ezequiel

and Johnny failed in opposite ways. If I go to the places where they lived, where they suffered, where they

died... maybe I'll find something that explains why consciousness isn't enough. Why I still feel empty even

'doing everything right.'"

HEIDELBERG - Johnny's Archive (August 2021)

University of Heidelberg, historical archives section:

Lyber and Marry accessed Johann Kestler's academic records (1882-1889).

What they found:

Perfect grades. All of them.

No student clubs

No documented social activity

No recorded friendships

Class photo (1886): Johnny in the corner, rigid posture, empty eyes

Marry (trembling voice): "He was a ghost even while alive."

Lyber (looking at photo): "..."

Marry: "Lyber? What is it?"

Lyber (first time he was completely honest with her):

"I see too much of myself in him, Marry. He used analysis to avoid vulnerability. I do the same. He built an

entire life on observing without participating. I... did therapy for 10 years, helped hundreds of people,

consider myself 'evolved.' But looking at him... I realize I just became a more sophisticated version of

Johnny. I'm not empty like he was. But I've built so much consciousness around my emotions that they've

become inaccessible."

Marry (gentle): "But you're here. He died before really living. You're still trying."

Lyber: "Am I? Or am I just observing my attempt?"

Silence.

MOLDOVA - Johnny's Grave (September 2021)

Abandoned monastery, small cemetery:

Simple tombstone:

JOHANN KESTLER

1864-1912

"He saw. He recorded. He witnessed."

Marry stayed there for hours. Cried. Spoke to him out loud.

Lyber observed from a distance (old habit).

But then something happened:

Marry collapsed. Not normal crying. Deep, visceral lament.

And Lyber... had impulse to analyze. "She's processing identification with Ezequiel, projecting..."

And then stopped. Thought:

"I'm doing exactly what Johnny did. I'm observing a crucial emotional moment instead of being in it."

Conscious choice: Sat beside her. Didn't touch (respected space). Just present.

First time in years he didn't try to "fix" or "analyze." Just... was.

Marry (afterwards, hoarse voice): "Lyber... thank you."

Lyber: "For what?"

Marry: "For not trying to save me. For just staying."

Lyber (revelation breaking something in him): "I'm learning that presence is enough."

ROMANIAN CARPATHIANS - Ezequiel's Grave (October 2021)

Almost abandoned village, Orthodox church still standing:

Father Andrei (70 years old) received them. Took them to cemetery.

Three graves side by side:

Ezequiel ben-Avraham (1847-1905)

Miriam bat-David (1862-1903)

Simeon Petrescu (1841-1919)

Crucial Conversation with Father Andrei:

Father (strong accent): "You are man who thinks a lot, yes?"

Lyber: "Yes. Is it a problem?"

Father: "Not problem. But also not solution. Ezequiel thought. Prayed. Suffered. Loved. All together. You...

separate too much."

Lyber (defensive): "Consciousness is my work."

Father (gentle): "Consciousness of head is easy. Consciousness of heart is difficult. You know one. Need to

know other."

Lyber: "How?"

Father: "Don't know. Each person different. But you here, seeking man dead 116 years... something in you

knows you need to change. Listen to that."

That night, in hotel room, Lyber wrote (first journal entry in months):

"Father Andrei is right. I know head consciousness. I can dissect any emotion, any pattern, any dynamic. But

I don't know how to inhabit my own life.

Ezequiel lived under extreme oppression for 48 years and still chose love.

Johnny observed that life for 13 years and died empty.

I'm somewhere between them. More alive than Johnny. Less integrated than Ezequiel.

And for the first time... I'm scared. Because I realize consciousness won't save me. Maybe it's even

imprisoning me.

I don't know what to do with this. But at least now I know there's a problem."

IX. AFTER THE JOURNEY (2021-PRESENT)

What Changed (and What Didn't)

Changed:

1. Recognized that consciousness can be escape, not liberation

2. Started distinguishing between "being conscious" and "being alive"

3. Allowed himself not to have a ready answer

4. Learned (started) to just be present without analyzing

Didn't Change (yet):

1. Pattern of emotional control in moments of stress

2. Difficulty with complete vulnerability

3. Visceral fear of losing control

4. Tendency to intellectualize when emotions get too intense

5. Undefined relationship with Marry (fear of ruining it with expectations)

The Book He's Finally Writing (2022-present)

Current Title: "What Two Dead Men Taught Me About Being Alive"

Fundamental Change:

First book (deleted): Academic analysis about consciousness.

Current book: Reflective memoir, interweaving:

Story of Ezequiel and Johnny

His own journey

Conversations with Marry

Insights about masculinity, control, vulnerability

Why it's working now:

Because he's not trying to be an expert. He's trying to be honest.

Excerpt (chapter 3):

"I spent a decade teaching men to be conscious of their emotions. 'Identify the feeling,' I would say. 'Name it.

Understand where it comes from.'

And they learned. Emotional vocabulary increased. They could say 'I'm angry' instead of just going silent.

But I realized something devastating: I was teaching men to talk about emotions without teaching them to

feel them. Because I didn't know how myself.

Johann Kestler documented 13 years of a saint's life without feeling anything. When he finally started

feeling, he couldn't integrate. Killed himself at 48.

I'm 38. And for the first time, I understand his terror. Because consciousness without embodiment is a

sophisticated prison. And I built that prison so carefully I didn't even notice I was trapped."

X. RELATIONSHIP WITH MARRY: THE UNTIED KNOT

What He Feels (and Doesn't Say)

Does Lyber love Marry?

Yes. But in a way that terrifies him.

Why doesn't he say it?

Superficial reason: "I don't want to ruin the only unique friendship I have."

Intermediate reason: "She's too intense. I'm too controlled. It wouldn't work."

Deep reason (the real one):

"If I admit I love her, I'll have to surrender completely. And surrender means losing control. Means she can

hurt me. Means I can hurt her. Means total risk. And I've spent 38 years building an entire life on minimizing

risk. I don't know how to dismantle that. Even wanting to."

What Marry Represents to Him

1. Inverted Mirror:

She feels everything intensely

He analyzes everything carefully

She lives emotion first, understands later

He understands first, feels (if he feels) later

2. Living Challenge:

She immediately detects when he's "therapizing"

Doesn't let him hide behind wisdom

Forces him to be human, not expert

Conversation that exemplifies (Portland, January 2022):

Marry (frustrated with something unrelated to him): "My mom called again. Wanting to 'help' with the

exhibition. And by 'help' she means control every detail because she doesn't trust I can do it alone and—"

Lyber (entering therapist mode): "It sounds like you're feeling boundary invasion. Your mother is probably

operating from a place of anxiety, and—"

Marry (cutting off, irritated): "Lyber. Stop."

Lyber: "What?"

Marry: "You're doing that thing. That voice. 'Therapist Lyber.' I don't need analysis. I need a friend who

says 'that sucks, your mom is being unbearable.'"

Lyber (disarmed): "Sorry. I... it's automatic."

Marry (softening): "I know. But you don't need to 'treat' me. You can just... be with me?"

Lyber (trying): "That sucks. Your mom is being unbearable."

Marry (laughing): "It was forced. But it's a start."

3. Attraction and Terror:

Lyber is attracted to Marry's intensity precisely because she embodies what he suppressed:

Vulnerability without filter

Emotional expression without prior analysis

Capacity to lose herself in the moment (art, crying, joy)

But this also terrifies him:

Fear 1: "If I give myself to her, I'll lose myself in her. Like I lost myself taking care of my mother."

Fear 2: "She needs emotional intensity I don't know how to give. I'll disappoint her."

Fear 3: "If we're together and it doesn't work, I lose the only person who really sees me."

Moments of Almost-Confession

MOMENT 1: Carpathians, Night After Cemetery (October 2021)

In hotel room (separate rooms, but connecting door). Late at night. Marry knocked on door.

Marry: "Are you awake?"

Lyber: "Yes. Come in."

She entered, wearing a sweatshirt, messy hair, red eyes from crying.

Marry: "Can't sleep. Keep thinking about Ezequiel. About how he loved Miriam even knowing he could

lose her. And he lost her. And it was still worth it."

Lyber (heart racing): "Do you think it was worth it?"

Marry: "I have to think so. Because if it wasn't worth it for him... then maybe it's not worth it for anyone.

And I need to believe it's worth it."

Silence. Lyber wanted to say: "It's worth it. I know it's worth it. Because the risk of loving you seems worth

it, even terrifying me."

What he said: "I think he would tell you it was worth it."

Marry (looking at him, something unsaid hanging): "Lyber... do you—"

Lyber (retreating): "You should sleep. Tomorrow is a long day."

She left. Door closed.

He stayed awake all night.

MOMENT 2: Portland, Marry's Exhibition (May 2022)

Vernissage of the "Sufficient Grace" series. Crowded gallery. Marry nervous but radiant.

Lyber saw the paintings for the first time complete:

Ezequiel in suffering

Johnny observing in the shadows

Marry painting both

And one that caught him off guard:

Painting #24: "Invisible Witnesses"

Three figures in layers:

Ezequiel praying (front)

Johnny observing (middle)

Female figure (Marry) painting (background)

And... a blurred masculine shadow behind her. Observing her observing them.

He knew: it was him.

End of night, gallery empty, just them:

Lyber: "The painting. The last one. Is that me?"

Marry (vulnerable): "You saw."

Lyber: "Why did you put me there?"

Marry: "Because you're in this story as much as I am. You... see me, Lyber. Like Ezequiel saw. Like Johnny

tried to see. You see me without trying to change me. And I... I needed you to know that I see you too."

Lyber (moment of courage): "Marry, I—"

Interruption. Someone came back to get their coat.

Moment passed.

MOMENT 3: Lyber's Birthday (June 2023, 40 years old)

Marry made dinner. Just the two of them. Her apartment.

After dinner, gift:

Leather notebook, handmade, blank pages.

Marry: "For the new book. Or journal. Or... whatever you want. But I want you to promise something."

Lyber: "What?"

Marry: "That you'll write truth. Not analysis of truth. Real truth. Without hiding behind beautiful words."

Lyber (touched): "Thank you, Marry. It's... perfect."

Marry (tone changing, more serious): "Lyber... can I ask something?"

Lyber: "Of course."

Marry: "Why do we never... why do we never talk about... us?"

Long silence.

Lyber (honest, but still controlled): "Because I'm afraid."

Marry: "Of what?"

Lyber: "Of ruining it. Of not being enough. Of hurting you. Of... many things."

Marry: "What if I told you I'm afraid too? But that... maybe it's worth it?"

Lyber (crucial moment, choice between control and risk):

What he wanted to say: "I love you. Maybe I've loved you for two years. You show me what it means to be

alive. But I'm terrified because loving you means letting go of control, and I don't know if I can."

What he actually said: "Marry... you deserve someone who knows how to feel without translating feeling into

words first. I'm still learning."

Marry (hiding disappointment): "It's okay. When you learn... let me know?"

Lyber: "If I learn."

Marry: "When. I have faith in you."

XI. DEEP PSYCHOLOGY

The Architecture of the Prison

Lyber built a defense system in four layers:

LAYER 1 - Hyper-Consciousness (External):

Always observing

Always analyzing

Always "present" (but present as witness, not participant)

LAYER 2 - Intellectualization (Intermediate):

Transforms emotion into concept

"I'm feeling anger" becomes "I'm experiencing limbic system activation due to perceived threat"

Distance through vocabulary

LAYER 3 - Emotional Hypervigilance (Deep):

Constant monitoring of own and others' emotional states

Born from need to predict when mother was at risk

Exhausting, but automatic

LAYER 4 - Central Emptiness (Core):

Place where emotion should be, but there's only... space

Not emptiness like Johnny (complete)

But emptiness as absence of visceral connection to own feelings

Like a room full of furniture covered by sheets - everything is there, but inaccessible

The Central Paradox

Johnny: Didn't feel anything. Built identity on emptiness.

Lyber: Feels, but doesn't directly access feelings. Built identity on consciousness of emptiness.

Crucial Difference:

Johnny was emotionally dead.

Lyber is emotionally dissociated, but doesn't realize it because dissociation is subtle and sophisticated.

It's like being anesthetized but still feeling pressure. You know something is being touched, but don't feel the

touch.

What He Really Needs (and Resists)

DOESN'T need: More consciousness. More analysis. More understanding.

NEEDS:

1. Surrender: Allow himself to lose control without catastrophizing

2. Embodiment: Inhabit body, not just observe from mind

3. Risk: Love Marry (or someone) totally, without guarantees

4. Anger: Process repressed anger against mother (and absent father)

5. Forgiveness: Forgive himself for not having "saved" Elise and others he couldn't save

Crucial Session with Dr. Chen (March 2023)

Dr. Chen: "Lyber, you talk about Marry constantly. But you never say you love her."

Lyber: "Because I don't know if it's love or projection or—"

Dr. Chen: "Stop. You're intellectualizing. Do you feel something when you think of her?"

Lyber (long pause): "Yes."

Dr. Chen: "What?"

Lyber: "...Fear. And... something warm. In my chest. Like... expansion?"

Dr. Chen: "That's love, Lyber."

Lyber: "But what if—"

Dr. Chen: "There's no 'what if.' You feel. It's real. What are you going to do with it?"

Lyber: "I don't know."

Dr. Chen: "Lie. You know. You're choosing not to. Because doing requires vulnerability you equate with

catastrophe. But ask yourself: what do you gain by maintaining control? And what do you lose?"

XII. SPIRITUAL DEVELOPMENT

Religious Background

Raised: Cultural Lutheran (Norwegian-American family)

Church on Sundays (until adolescence)

Confirmation at 14

But never "personal faith," just family tradition

Ages 18-35: Functional agnostic

Not hostile to religion

Just... indifferent

"If God exists, He's beyond my capacity to know. So why speculate?"

The Awakening Through Ezequiel (2020-2023)

Reading Ezequiel's manuscripts:

For the first time, confronted faith that was:

Honest about suffering

Didn't offer easy answers

Lived with doubt

But remained anchored in Christ

Ezequiel's phrase that haunted him:

"I no longer pray for relief. I pray for companionship in pain."

Lyber thought: "That... that makes sense. God not as vending machine, but as presence."

Conversations with Marry About Faith (2021-2023)

Marry (Jewish fascinated by Jesus): "Do you believe in God?"

Lyber (honest): "I don't know. I want to believe there's something beyond materialism. But I don't know to

call it God. And I certainly don't know what to do with Jesus."

Marry: "Ezequiel knew. Doesn't that intrigue you?"

Lyber: "It intrigues. But it also scares me. Because if God is real... then there are things beyond my control.

And control is all I know."

Moment of Opening (Carpathians, 2021)

In the Orthodox church where Ezequiel prayed:

Lyber entered alone (Marry was talking with the priest).

Empty church. Icons on walls. Candles lit.

He sat. Didn't pray (didn't know how). Just... stayed.

And for the first time, felt something.

Not God (wasn't sure). But... presence? Peace? Something analysis didn't reach.

Thought:

"If Ezequiel found something here... something real enough to sustain him for 48 years of suffering... then

maybe it's worth investigating."

Not conversion. But openness.

Current State (2023): Honest Seeker

Lyber isn't Christian (yet?).

But he's:

Reading New Testament for the first time (started with Gospel of Mark)

Occasionally attending nearby Episcopal church (silent liturgy, little social pressure)

Talking with Marry about faith

In therapy with Dr. Chen (Buddhist) about spirituality

Hesitant Prayer (first time he tried, alone, 2023):

"God... if you exist... I don't know how to talk to you. I don't know if I believe. But Ezequiel believed. And

he was wiser than me.

So... if you're there... help. Because I don't know how to live without control. And it seems you ask exactly

that.

I don't know if I can. But I'm trying to be open.

Is that enough?"

Silence.

But different silence. Not empty. Just... quiet.

Not answer. But not rejection.

Central Theological Question for Lyber

"Can I control my spiritual journey or do I need to surrender to it?"

Irony he recognizes: even search for God became intellectual project.

"I'm studying spirituality the same way I'd study psychology. With distance. With analysis. With control."

"But everything I read about genuine faith says: you need to leap without safety net."

"And I... don't know how to do that."

Conversation with Marry (August 2023):

Marry: "You've been reading about Jesus for months. What do you think?"

Lyber: "I think that... if he was who he said he was... then everything changes."

Marry: "But?"

Lyber: "But I don't know if I can make the leap. Faith requires surrender. And I've spent 38 years avoiding

surrender."

Marry: "So you understand intellectually, but can't embody it."

Lyber (recognizing pattern): "...exactly. Like everything in my life."

Marry: "Lyber, maybe faith isn't about being sure before jumping. Maybe it's about jumping and finding out

on the way."

Lyber: "What if I fall?"

Marry: "Then you fall into God. At least that's what Ezequiel would say."

XIII. THE BOOK PROJECT

"What Two Dead Men Taught Me About Being Alive"

Structure (in progress, 60% complete):

PART I: THE EMPTY OBSERVER

Chapter 1: Who Was Johann Kestler

Chapter 2: The Man Who Didn't Feel

Chapter 3: Why I Recognized Myself in Him

Chapter 4: Consciousness as Prison

PART II: THE INTEGRATED SUFFERER

Chapter 5: Who Was Ezequiel ben-Avraham

Chapter 6: The Man Who Felt Too Much

Chapter 7: 48 Years Under Oppression

Chapter 8: Faith Without Easy Answers

PART III: THE MODERN WITNESS

Chapter 9: How I Found This Story

Chapter 10: The Journey to the Carpathians

Chapter 11: What Marry Taught Me

Chapter 12: Dismantling My Fortress

PART IV: LESSONS FROM DEAD MEN

Chapter 13: Consciousness Isn't Enough

Chapter 14: Suffering Isn't Waste

Chapter 15: Love Requires Surrender

Chapter 16: Grace for Observers (not yet written)

Tone of the Book:

Not academic. Not self-help.

Philosophical memoir. Honest. Vulnerable. No easy answers.

Target Audience:

Men (primarily) between 30-50 who:

Intellectualize to avoid feeling

Use consciousness as shield

Are "doing everything right" but feel empty

Want integration, not just information

Excerpt (Chapter 3):

"Johann Kestler spent 13 years observing Ezequiel ben-Avraham live intensely while he lived... barely at all.

When I first read this, I thought: 'What a waste. What a tragedy.'

Then I realized: I was doing the same thing.

Not for 13 years. For 28.

Since age 12, when I found my mother unconscious and something in me decided: 'Never again will I lose

control. Never again will I be caught off guard.'

And I complied. Became an exceptionally conscious man. Competent therapist. Analyst of others' emotions.

But somewhere in the process, I stopped living my own life.

I just started observing it.

Like Johnny.

And it took finding his story - and Ezequiel's - to realize: consciousness without embodiment isn't liberation.

It's just a more sophisticated cage."

XIV. PHYSICAL APPEARANCE AND MANNERISMS

Physical (38-40 years old)

Structure:

6'0" (1.83m), lean but not fragile (practices yoga, walks a lot)

Slightly curved shoulders (years sitting as therapist)

Expressive hands when relaxed, controlled when tense

Face:

Dirty blond hair, usually messy (not by style, by forgetting to comb)

Blue-gray eyes, intense but kind

Incipient wrinkles around eyes (from thinking too much, not laughing too much)

Purposeful stubble (Pacific Northwest aesthetic)

Style:

Flannel shirt, jeans, Clarks boots

Nothing flashy, everything functional

Only "vanity": grandfather's vintage watch (connection to Norwegian ancestry)

Revealing Mannerisms

1. Pause Before Responding:

Processes everything before speaking

Long silences aren't uncomfortable for him (they are for others)

Marry noticed: the longer the pause, the more emotional the topic

2. Touches Chin When Thinking:

Unconscious gesture

Marry imitates it playfully

He doesn't notice he does it

3. Smiles Little, But When He Smiles It's Genuine:

Rare smile, but transforms face completely

Marry lives to make him smile

He doesn't know this

4. Consistent But Not Invasive Eye Contact:

Looks in eyes when listening

But looks away when talking about himself (vulnerability)

Marry noticed: when he maintains eye contact talking about his own emotions, it's progress

5. Walks Slowly:

Everything is meditation for him (even walking)

Marry has to slow down when they walk together

He doesn't notice he's slow

6. Unconsciously Organizes Objects:

Aligns pens, squares books, straightens pictures

Need for external order when internal is chaotic

When he's relaxed, doesn't do this

7. Drinks Coffee Very Slowly:

One cup lasts 2 hours

Forgets he's holding it

Marry has already thrown away three of his cold coffees

Physical Changes After Breakdown (2023)

Before:

Rigid posture

Shallow breathing (always in chest)

Rarely touched people

After:

Slightly more relaxed posture

Deeper breathing (learned in somatic therapy)

Touches Marry casually (hand on shoulder, longer hugs)

XV. STRENGTHS AND FLAWS

Genuine Strengths

1. Theoretical Emotional Intelligence: Understands psychological dynamics with exceptional clarity

2. Non-Judgmental Presence: When he can exit therapist mode, offers profound acceptance

3. Listening Capacity: Really listens, doesn't just wait his turn to speak

4. Intellectual Humility: Knows he doesn't know everything (unlike many therapists)

5. Commitment to Growth: Actively works his shadows, even when painful

6. Deep Loyalty: When he commits (friendship, project), is absolutely reliable

Flaws and Shadows

1. Control Disguised as Consciousness: Uses awareness as control mechanism

2. Defensive Intellectualization: Flees from vulnerability through analysis

3. Perfectionism in Personal Growth: Even spiritual journey became performance

4. Conflict Avoidance: Prefers solitude to risk of rejection

5. Subtle Arrogance: Believes if he can understand something, he can control it

6. Hidden Codependency: Still defines value through usefulness to others

The Unintegrated Shadow (What Lyber Denies)

1. Need to Be Saved:

Projects savior role onto others

But he also needs rescue

Terror of admitting need

2. Deep Anger (Not Processed):

Against mother for turning him into emotional therapist

Against father for never being present

Against himself for never "breaking" as a child

This anger is frozen, not accessible

3. Desire to Be Completely Seen:

Hides behind wisdom

But desperately wants someone (Marry) to see his fragility

And not fix it, just recognize it

4. Envy of Marry:

She feels freely

He envies that

And hates that he envies because he "should" be "beyond" that

XVI. CHARACTER ARC

Where He Was (2018)

Competent therapist, emotionally dissociated, alone, hiding behind wisdom, in silent burnout.

Where He Is (2023)

More vulnerable, less controlled, in process, writing honestly, learning that "being conscious" ≠ "being alive."

But hasn't completed journey yet. Hasn't fully surrendered yet.

Where He Needs to Arrive

Five Pending Lessons:

1. Feel Before Analyzing (At least sometimes):

Experience emotion directly

Allow anger, sadness, joy without immediately translating them into concepts

Inhabit body, not just mind

2. Admit Love for Marry (Total Risk):

Say "I love you" without intellectual qualifiers

Accept that love is surrender, not control

Allow himself to be hurt if necessary

3. Confront Anger Against Mother:

Stop "understanding" and start feeling betrayal

Process that 12-year-old child shouldn't save mother

Forgive her without minimizing impact

4. Accept Limitations of Consciousness:

Can't have total awareness always

And that's OK

Mystery isn't threat

5. Allow Himself to Be Loved Without Earning It:

Value doesn't come from usefulness

Grace is also for him

Can be loved just for existing

The Breaking Moment That Still Needs to Happen

Lyber needs a scene where:

Something breaks control completely. Not by choice, but by circumstance.

Narrative Options:

Option A - Marry Gets Hurt (literal or emotional): And he can't "fix" it. Has to just be with her in pain. And

realizes: presence is love.

Option B - Death of Ingrid (mother): Everything repressed for 30 years surfaces. Cries like he hasn't cried

since age 12. Anger, sadness, love, resentment - all together, unfiltered.

Option C - He Himself Gets Sick: Something physical that forces dependence on others (Marry cares for him).

Learns to receive without giving. Forced vulnerability.

Option D - Marry Confronts Him with Ultimatum: "Lyber, I love you. But I can't dance around this

anymore. Either you risk with me, or I need to move on. Decide."

And he has to choose: control or love. Can't have both.

XVII. CHARACTERISTIC QUOTES

About Consciousness

"I spent a decade teaching people to be conscious. No one told me you can be conscious and still not be

alive."

"Consciousness should be a tool of liberation. I turned it into a sophisticated prison."

"The problem with being hyperconscious is that you observe your own life instead of living it."

About Johnny

"Johann Kestler is my nightmare. A man who observed everything and felt nothing. I could have been him.

Maybe I still am, just with a psychology degree."

"Johnny died without being able to integrate feeling and thought. I'm 40 years old. How much time do I have

before I become him?"

About Ezequiel

"Ezequiel had what I don't: capacity to suffer without dissecting suffering. He just... lived. Intensely.

Painfully. But fully."

"He chose love even when it cost everything. I can't even choose love when it only costs control."

About Marry

"She feels everything I spend years trying to understand. That terrifies and fascinates me in equal measure."

"Marry teaches me that love isn't understanding someone completely. It's being with someone completely.

And I... still don't know how to do that."

"When she cries, my first reaction is to analyze why she's crying. When it should just be to hold her while

she cries. The distance between those two things is where I live."

About Himself

"I discovered that emotional intelligence isn't the same as emotional courage. I have the first. Still seeking

the second."

"My father taught me emotions are dangerous. My mother taught me I'm responsible for others' emotions.

Perfect combination to create a man terrified of feeling."

"I'm not cold like they think. I'm frozen. Crucial difference: ice is still water. It just needs to melt."

"I spent 28 years being strong. I discovered that strength isn't never falling. It's allowing yourself to be

lifted."

About Relationship with Marry (not said to her, only in journal)

"Marry teaches me that love isn't a personal growth project. It's surrender. And I... still don't know how to

surrender."

"She sees me. Really sees me. And that terrifies me because if she sees me completely, she'll see the

emptiness too. And she'll realize there's nothing to love."

"Lie I tell myself: 'I need to be more integrated before I can love her fully.' Truth I avoid: 'I'm afraid to love

her fully because that requires vulnerability I equate with death.'"

After the Breakdown (post-collapse)

"I thought control protected me. I discovered it imprisoned me."

"Marry stayed with me while I fell apart. Didn't try to fix. Just stayed. I learned more about love that night

than in 10 years studying psychology."

"Ezequiel said: 'Grace was sufficient.' I didn't understand for years. Now I understand: grace isn't strength

not to fall. It's God's presence when you fall. And permission to be lifted by others."

CONCLUSION: THE JOURNEY CONTINUES

Lyber Henrik Arnesen is a man who spent 38 years building a fortress of consciousness to protect himself from

the chaos that almost destroyed him at age 12.

He became:

Exceptionally competent therapist

Profoundly disconnected from his own life

Master of observing without participating

Expert in analyzing emotions without feeling them

His journey is about learning that:

Consciousness isn't enough

Control is an illusion

Love requires surrender

Presence is more valuable than analysis

Being seen in weakness is more intimate than being admired in strength

He represents thousands of men (and women) who:

Did therapy

Read self-help books

"Worked on themselves"

But still feel fundamentally empty

Because they treated personal growth as intellectual project, not embodied transformation.

His story teaches:

Integration doesn't come from more knowledge.

It comes from surrender.

Not from perfected control.

From abandoned control.

Not from better observation.

From courageous participation.

And perhaps most importantly:

Grace reaches even those who live in their heads, afraid to descend into their hearts.

Lyber's journey isn't finished.

At 40, he's learning what Ezequiel knew at 20 and Johnny never learned:

Life isn't meant to be observed.

It's meant to be lived.

Even when - especially when - that means losing control.

"Maybe the greatest consciousness is realizing that consciousness isn't enough."

— Lyber Arnesen, journal, 2023

LICENSE

This work is licensed under Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International (CC BY-SA 4.0)

You are free to:

Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format

Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material for any purpose, even commercially

Under the following terms:

Attribution — You must give appropriate credit to João Vitor Perazzolo (Johnny Kestler), provide a link to

the license, and indicate if changes were made

ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions

under the same license as the original

Full license: https://creativecommons.org/licenses/by-sa/4.0/

END OF DOCUMENT

Lyber Henrik Arnesen: The Man Who Built a Prison of Consciousness

Created by João Vitor Perazzolo (Johnny Kestler)

2025